24 can also be divided into 3 rectangles, each with an area of 8. Again, correct, but not helpful. How to simplify √45 as 3√5 and √72 as 6√2 are also shown above. Again, factors that are perfect squares are key.
Hopefully you have a chef that insists on this level of cleanliness.
She stops
I have 4 pieces in the works right now. Alter ego would never let 4 pieces sit for this long. They get stale when they sit. Alter ego has better work hours than I do, though. He recognizes that, but he says that I have to make the time. The job isn’t gonna change, so the art has to. Alter ego is right.
In my case it’s all to do with freakishly long arms. My arms, wrist to wrist, are over 6 feet in length, and apparently too long relative to the rest of my torso. Most men’s shirts are based on a set of assumptions about the proportions of the 3 basic dimensions of a shirt: collar size, chest size and sleeve length. So if you pop into virtually any clothing store men shirt sizes are described only in collar size: 16, 16½, 17, etc. The assumption is that if your collar is 16½ inches in diameter then your chest size and sleeve length will be within certain parameters. So woe betide the man who, like me, needs a 16 or 16½ inch collar shirt but whose arms are not the expected 34 inches in length or whose chest is not 44 inches. My way round this was to buy shirts which had my sleeve length, in my case 17½ inch shirts, which were up to 3 sizes too large. Here’s the crucial thing. I did not know I was buying shirts that were too large; I thought this was my size because if I bought shirts smaller than 17½ I had an unseemly gap between the end of my sleeves and the end of my wrist.
Well, then you’d have that commercial with the little girl with the hair being blown all over the place as she looks at a flower. I don’t know why her father doesn’t roll up that window for her, considering how taken she is with the begonia. Isn’t this a form of child abuse? Admittedly, not as bad as where that insurance guy offers one kid a pony and tells the other kid he can’t have one because he doesn’t have the special “equine rider” in his homeowner’s policy. But it’s certainly right up there with the ad where a skinny boy angers the local bullies, then runs and jumps in the back of his mom’s minivan, and she backs over the bullies.
Early on in our ‘efforts to work things out’ I think my husband stumbled upon my coping mechanism. I’m only noticing this now because it seems that he took those coping mechanisms away when we discussed things each of us did that made our lives miserable. Not to say that my coping was healthy, and now that I don’t do it as much anymore, the ill effect it had on my children is amplified ten thousand-fold. I used to read whole books in one night/afternoon truly sinking myself into it, losing myself in the world created by the books. I would ignore everything…my husband, my kids…After my husband asked that I make an effort and not read books, when he went back to drinking I decided not to go back to books. I found that I had been excessive and figured I should try to participate more. Then my husband kept drinking, and these days it seems like each time is getting worse and worse. So I found a new coping mechanism; the Internet. Once again, I let myself sink into the world the Internet provided me to the exclusion of all else. Once again, when we ‘tried to work things out’ he asked that I stop using the Internet so much since I’d basically replaced my addiction to books with an addiction to the Internet.
I’m just another neon glow, a neon light, a shoegaze song, a distorted plight
The following article published in the "Times Union" is relevant to the Ridgewood Reservoir's habitats because several species of endangered, threatened and special concern designation have been identified within the basins.
I often think about things too complex and impossible to ever figure out - like how different I might be had I been raised by different parents, gone to different schools, grown up in a different country...so on and so on. It is my belief that people are shaped as much by the environment they grow up in and the people they grow up with, every bit as much as their DNA is responsible for who they are.
I liked Brenna and Dillon together. I could tell that they were the perfect fit to heal each other’s wounds. I just wish that they had been given a full story to flesh out all the complexities Kent gives them. While the novella felt complete…the reader in me itched for a little more time. Maybe Kent will re-release in time as a longer work. I’d like to know more of their histories, spend some time with the mountain people, watch Dillon work on his woodworking craft shirtless…And I’d really love to see some of the love letters the characters sent to each other…Hint, Hint! lol.
When it turns a deep amber color, add the butter and stir until it is melted. Add the heavy cream and whisk until the caramel is smooth. Remove from heat and let cool. (I totally forgot to take a picture of the finished product, but I promise this will turn into caramel!)
chasing progress
Some of us are more faithful to our coffee than our prayer line. So lets substitute coffee for prayer. What do I mean? That means you got to have your coffee, first thing in the morning, right? So now replace coffee with prayer. You must have about three to four cup per day. Okay lets pray about 3-4 times per day.
The tracker had worked himself into a position on the periphery of the Governor’s inner circle. After losing his family and struggling to survive for several months, things had just started to go his way.
For all the mind-bending technical sorcery, I do have one major gripe with Incurso, and that is the songwriting. Simply put, no song managed to stick with me, even after a dozen listens. It's almost as if the musicians were so busy playing at breakneck speeds and cramming in as many riffs per song as possible, that they forgot they're supposed to be crafting songs, not technical exhibitions. So while I stand in awe of their technical prowess, their latest album is more of a carpe diem affair: get hyperblasted now, remember none of it later.
* Pay cheque into bank
"The best way to get back on your feet---miss a car payment."
The Lord is so good, no matter what your situation is today, if you will trust Him, not even so much for healing, just trust Him, then you will fly where the eagles fly and you will venture into the realm of the miraculous, into the land of the dynamic, for trust is the gateway to the kingdom of God. This kingdom is here and it is now, since we have to walk through this life, let us walk together in the kingdom that was, and is, and is to come and the night will shine like the day.
We sell Mormon souls to the devil.
The department general director, Supol Sripan, said the call centre will allow tourists to register complaints around the clock rather than just during the ministry’s office hours.
She's all about:
There are two topics I generally try to avoid discussing. Number one on the list is homosexuality. Number two is most things having to do with religion, although it is impossible to ignore it in a world where a militant Islam is causing so much conflict.
And then came INCEPTION.
Angel Six: “God’s plan is never complete.”
Ottawa could soon join the club.
We arrived at Church, sat down and waited for the service to start. People were talking and walking to their seats and Kim was looking over his shoulder and so I eyed the same direction and saw his friend gesturing up until he sees me looking at him and then he froze. I was thinking okay…these guys are up to something but church started and nothing special was happening except for Kim who kept on looking at his phone and what it seemed like trying to hide the screen from me. I was thinking how rude, almost reading to give him a serious poke or pinch in the arm. He had just received a BlackBerry for his birthday you see and he was having a hard time letting putting it away, but common, in Church? I started to get really annoyed with him but I couldn’t really make a scene in Church could I? So, I tried to ignore him as much as possible.
I will leave that thought with you.
When I saw Pam's card, my paper crafting wheels started turning and I thought it would be so cool to create a one layer card with a pop-up sentiment - so that's what I did.
For my last study I chose a photo reference that Carol and her husband sent after I inquired about what a big snow looked like in New York City. Kaiya, their dog, was not in the photo. I added that from another photo. Thank-you, Carol and husband, for the references! What prompted my wanting to try this was a little original watercolor card that my sister had sent me a year ago. That artist had painted a snow scene in black of skyscrapers in the background and park bench in foreground. On the park bench was a Christmas gift and it was the only thing in color. I really was impressed with the contrast. Thus, the inclusion of Kaiya, in color, to see if I could achieve the same effect. I used no white in the city scene. The white is the white of the paper.
The whole scenario may not seem like a big deal, but for me, it was. See this post for background. If I had truly believed we would have been better off leaving, I have faith that I would have been able to do it in a constructive way. In taking a step back and taking a few deep breaths, I was able to resist my knee-jerk reaction and try something new.
What I learned today is...that it always takes longer than I think...plan, strategize, be patient (with yourself most of all), be ready and be open....
“There's been a bit of an accident with your stocking,” Kates mum told me as I took my coat off.
Granted we’ll have to work at it a lot harder than we did before, we can’t take eachother for granted, I can’t just assume he’ll always be there and he can’t assume I always will be – what I can do is put everything into him and hope to get the same back. As long as we are honest with one another and can remember why we fell in love every single day then we’ll be fine. If I only ever feel as in love with him as I am now, then I’m in love with him enough to never need anyone else.
I picked up a Louis L’amour book in Mazar-e-Sharif and read it there. Like so much of his writing, a bit stood out above the rest to me and spoke words of wisdom.
Thanks for your help,
"Spring came; he worked on his patch of ground, and planted potatoes. his live stock multiplied...he made a bigger shed for them...and put a couple of glass panes in there too.
The day came when the beautiful Airavata, walking in his majestic lilting step, arrived at his favourite place by the river to bathe, but he found it dry – dry as dust, dry as bone. Then Airavara raised his huge trunk to the sky and roared, a roar so full of sadness it is said that his master, Indra, the Lord of Heaven himself, was brought to tears. These tears spurred Indra to bring the suffering of his people to an end. So it was that Indra called on Airavata to reach his trunks deep into the bowels of the earth and draw up water from the ancient underground springs. When Airavata’s heads finally re-emerged Indra ordered him to trumpet the water up into the sky to form rain clouds. Thick elephant bellied clouds gathered in the sky as Airavata sent up a deafening triumphant roar that ricoched through the universe. The great elephant reared up on his hind legs and pierced the clouds with his forceful tusks. Celestial rain poured down upon the earth and the rivers filled once more with water.
-“What’s the matter?” The women looked at the man standing at the door , a worry cloud resting on his manly face.
BrainRants says that opinions are like assholes; everybody has one and they all stink. I find that there are three levels of opinion. First, people do have them. The second level is that all too many people feel that they have to share theirs with others. There’s not really anything wrong with sharing. Obviously almost every blog is the sharing of someone’s opinion. The trick is to be able to get away from those who share, and share, and share, ad nauseam, about Kardashian marriages, or Celine Dion’s latest album, or the cost of copy machine toner.
#12PT Josh Bard - Let's Play Too! (Indians)
If you do decided to try out CM9 on your HTC One X, you will get working mobile network, GPS, Bluetooth, Bluetooth tethering, Wi-Fi, hardware video decoder, hardware acceleration, audio, and MIC.
Trayvon asked Zimmerman if he had a problem. Zimmerman said, ‘no.’
Mummy xx
Root Candles are highly regarded for complex bouquets of subtle fragrances and sophisticated color palettes, important factors for discerning candle lovers. Today, Root Candles can confidently lay claim to making "the best candles in America.”
THAT WOULD FULLY EXPRESS WHAT HE IS TO ME
For the Memorial Service on April the 5th there will be a service in Dutch and one in English in in Kessel-Lo, an English service in Mons.
People Magazine, US Weekly, Cosmopolitan, all the other magazines that line our shelves of markets and drugstores. I know many of us have read these magazines. Usually from a young age we want to follow all the advice in Cosmopolitan, even if it means dangling from a scarf from your ceiling fan to get the most alluring body pose to appeal to the opposite sex (or same sex).
tape around the edges of die template.
“We will not recognize Israel as a state,” he said. “It will be like the relationship between Lebanon and Israel or Syria and Israel.”
I have featured the Organic Lavender Rose Bath Salts in my Organic Lavender Gift Set which would be great as a Mother's Day gift!! Check it out here♦
I’m so lucky to be included in this group! I have stepped down as the DT Coordinator, but I am so excited to have Wendy Jordan leading the team as the new DT Coordinator with Jennifer Ingle supporting her as the Assistant DT Coordinator! These ladies are fabulous and I know they will be incredible in these roles!
I Love You Golden Blue
Still, the bobo-ization of American radicalism is not limited to such obvious cases. When you hear activists loudly insisting that it’s possible to save the world without being an ascetic—and I’m sorry to say that, yes, that well-worn trope turned up in the Owen Lloyd book review cited above—you’re hearing the echoes of bobo influence, in the form of the popular but profoundly wrong notion that it must somehow be possible to maintain today’s unsustainable lifestyles on a sustainable basis. That’s not going to happen, for reasons that reach right down into the laws of thermodynamics; no amount of handwaving is going to make it happen; and the sooner we get used to living with a lot less, the less damage we will do to ourselves, each other, and the Earth as the industrial economy sputters to a halt.
After watching Mandingo, I wanted to see if anybody had written about it more recently, especially within the film blogosphere, and that's when I discovered some real gems. I can't say I loved the film in the way some people have, but I certainly think the original critics who hated it missed the mark completely. It's a remarkable corrective to and comment on such things as Gone with the Wind, and some moments reminded me strongly of Gillo Pontecorvo's Burn!, particularly in the way both movies complicate the viewer's sympathies for the white protagonist.
China has dismissed the Philippine claims, saying it has sovereignty on those areas since ancient times.
Since they are mainly used for playing games its performance should be better than the average computers. Undoubtedly its CPU should be faster and should have large memory and also it should have a large resolution display. Intel and AMD are the two well known CPU manufacturers. The prices of Intel processors are slightly higher than that of AMD processors. However, both are capable of providing unmatched gaming experience.
Bottom, amiable enough to the infatuated Titania, is truly charmed by the four elves, and they by Bottom, who would be one of them even without benefit of Puckish translation:
“I have somewhere the same.”
I wanted something more in life than just, well, money I guess. Sure, money can bring me places, buy me nice food, branded bags, anything I want without really having to think about whether I can afford it because most times I can. But when I had it, I realized there was something more I wanted to do with my life - going after and accomplishing my dreams and goals. Of course I enjoyed flying and the job itself. I loved interaction with the passengers, and did my work with pride. I am proud to say that without instigating, I always had about 20 compliment letters a year. During my last month of flying, almost every single flight I did had a passenger write me a compliment letter to the company. I really loved the job, but entertainment line is something that won't wait for you. And that was something I felt I didn't try hard enough in. SQ? I gave my 100% already.
MK-newMiriam Knight, founder
Safari
trying to say something categorically meaningful about how IP plays itself out in that most elusive of places, "the real world." This has once again become acute as this Kat works on an article on one of his IP fascinations--sublicensing. In particular, we have been wrestling with the question of "why do people engage in sublicensing"? We can discourse about how to define sublicensing, what is its legal rationale and what are its most distinctive contractual elements. But all of these considerations rest on the fact, as this Kat's anecdotal experience confirms, that the sublicensing of IP rights is a wide-spread phenomenon. If so, how can this Kat get its "IP paws" around that most simple of questions--"why do people engage in sublicensing"?. As with so many deceptively simple questions, the answer is both multi-layered and multi-faceted. Set out below is our first feline stab at offering an answer.
Medium colony - 1d8, 15% chance of QUEEN
And yes, I know, I've been totally slacking on the blog. University is kind of crazy with these things called midterms.
happy birthday tula mirth. you are my heart.
Pick #9
What I saw on that ultrasound screen was nothing. An empty uterus. The Dr. pointed out a tiny shadow where he said the “remnants” of the pregnancy where. But all hope was gone. There was not anything there anymore to hope for. Maybe there never was.
Sweet delights? Christmas tree so yummy (: This little display is perfect for a christmas celebration. Bring it to work, impress your family, share and eat. This is one tree that is not going wasted :D
And just to be clear, the love of money is not the root but a root of evil. Not every evil thing has to do with money or greed. But being a root, it will work its way deep into the ground of our heart and into many areas of our life. Roots seek the waters of our life and they will tap in and suck the life-giving flow from us if at all possible. These roots hotly pursue the river of true prosperity within us, in order to leave us dry and barren.
"Are you searching for unusual, offbeat, unique or peculiar gifts to give for the holidays?
Stephen W. Smith is the co-founder and spiritual director of Potter’s Inn, a ministry devoted to spiritual formation and the care of the soul. As a frequent speaker and retreat leader, he has committed himself to the spiritual growth and transformation of individuals, couples, churches and organizations. Previously he has planted and led churches in North America and Europe. He also served as adjunct professor of preaching at Tyndale Theological Seminary in Badhovedorp, The Netherlands. He is the author of six books, including The Lazarus Life, Living the Lazarus Life, Soul Custody and Soul Shaping. Stephen and his wife, Gwen, reside in Colorado.
Incomplete/missing information
But, dammit, I'm not the type who stands around not intervening. Especially for a little girl, no older than my own, who just almost had the hair yanked off her head by the woman who's supposed to protect her in this world.
The whole idea is predicated on an inability to understand basic mathematics. Not only are these targets absolutely irrelevant to Britain’s survival or insolvency – we are talking about saving over four years a sum that represents very little more than the deficit per annum, and a mere 1.4% of the National Debt – even these aren’t being achieved: the current running annual budget deficit rose to £11.1 billion last February, and borrowing rose to £15.2 billion.
Guess her weight to the nearest ounce, and you'll win a $5 SN gift certificate. She is a full-term baby- but no other hints!
My thought for the day: a body is an amazing thing. YOUR body is! So is mine! For those of you who are just starting your journey....or are mid-journey and still striving hard toward some goals.....HAVE FAITH AND KEEP GOING! A body responds well to good nourishment and rigorous exercise!
So I figured I'd take the opportunity
Girls girls girls are made to Love...Eddie Hodges
A new light fixture isn't really in the budget, and removing the fan isn't really practical for my little head-sweater...but I've got an idea to mask the homely of the big bulb. Fingers crossed.
Pseudonym: Project Artichoke
Mare51089: how did you know?
Only after buying it, I found out that one of my guitar heroes, Mike Slamer, was in the band. Which certainly adds to the charm of City Boy.
I took Joe and Leo to Scouts at 7, and Kari took Jim with her. We worked on looking at books and seeing what achievements we needed for rank. A few of the boys are REALLY close. I pulled out a small table to work at outside, and I let the boys play tag. Worked out good. Then, the last 20 minutes, we talked about courage and choices. They had a lot of fun with that one too. A lot of talk about kicking the bad guys in the balls... Sigh. Boys. I kept having to say "We don't say ball sack at Cub Scouts..."
But after Google came Facebook. And in the age of Facebook, Microsoft seems to be taking a page from Kleiner’s old keiretsu playbook. Microsoft is building a team of outsiders and unlikely heroes — bonded by strategy or shareholdings or both — to ensure it has a place at the table. If not to usurp the seat at the head of the table.
Misfortune by Nancy Geary
I really liked it but it was a bit tight.
2014 Spiritual progress tends toward ever more intimate union with Christ. This union is called “mystical” because it participates in the mystery of Christ through the sacraments – “the holy mysteries” – and, in him, in the mystery of the Holy Trinity. God calls us all to this intimate union with him, even if the special graces or extraordinary signs of this mystical life are granted only to some for the sake of manifesting the gratuitous gift given to all.
WhatAboutClients?, written by Dan Hull, a blog which transmogrifies into WhatAboutParis? at weekends, is quirky, provocative and eclectic – and very much focused on client service. Note to “Publius”: In 2011, resolve to grow a pair and use your real name on the Internet. “This blog’s policy is no-name no-publish. We’ve written about it a lot. Because, among other things, we need to know exactly how to address that summons or subpoena, you know?” (I am not within this rule because I am not anonymous, as my About Section makes clear)
I believe in underdogs and long odds.
I'm doing more hours, more work (for the same pityful pittance) and as if that wasn't bad enough they've given me a much crappier shift too.
Your mental state of mind is as much a part of the sales you make as any of the principles I discuss in this book. Now I am not a mental health professional so don’t take anything I say as medical advice. My only experience in dealing with psychology is that which I have lived through personally. As I stated earlier I am very introspective which I often consider to be a fault of mine. I toss and turn at night reliving the day and breaking down situations.
It works pretty well to bend the wire like so before doing the swirl… it just keeps it nicely in place.
In other words, the island fox’s woes trace back to the earlier effort to eradicate the island’s sheep population. One can only wonder what kind of unintended consequences the killing of the pigs might cause.
In the first laugh out loud funny sequence John shows a blurred out photo of an African man he always sees at parties around Melbourne. Women are always swooning over him, and talking about how hot he is, but John has the sneaking suspicion that he’s really not that attractive and more like a four or a five out of ten. John, being John, hops on a plane and flies all the way to Togo to ask a local if the Togolese fellow he knows is an attractive guy, or just kind of average.
If you look at this cake, you are probably thinking, THIS MAKES NO SENSE. And you're right, I kinda pulled Gordian Knot effect by putting a tunnel exit where there is no train, but in truth, I was hoping that Thomas was going to look like he was coming out of a cake, not a tunnel.
Students can continue their study of Indonesian in Spring 2013 and are also encouraged to consider participating in one of several study abroad opportunities noted in the attached flier – through participation in ANU’s In-Country Program, students could complete 2 years of Indonesian study in a total of three terms. Your assistance in sharing this information with your students would be greatly appreciated and we would be pleased to provide any additional information you or your students may require.
Today I realize that God’s Will simply means that I AM here to LIVE. I AM here to enjoy all of L.I.F.E. I am here as a perfect part of the experience of living and all that I dream and desire is already mine because it was given to me in the promise. God’s Will for my L.I.F.E. is simply that I enjoy and live my L.I.F.E. fully.
Labour were still the biggest party with 47.5% of the electorate backing them. This equated to 545 wards. The SNP improved a smidge with 17.5% and 201 wards. The Tories and the Lib Dems improved a bit, but still Labour were huge.
Cast: Peter Fonda, Warren Oates, Loretta Swit, Lara Parker Dir: Jack Starrett C-88 mins
Click below to download--
Maple Butter cream:
And I wonder: could it be, that it was the same ruthless hand who snuffed out the life – in official records – of innocently-born Bâri′ M. Shabazz?
This would appear to be a simple, trenchant condemnation of homosexuality.
When I jumped into the water - the cold was shocking, my limbs became less mobile. I grasped for air. When I submerged my face I was blind with no sense of direction, just surrounded by dark murky water. When water filled my ears I could not hear anything but muffled voices from the shore, water splashing as swimmers entered the water and my own chaotic thoughts. In the midst of it was the feeling of being rushed and pushed to go forward. I tried to focus on Ivey and I panicked. This was Ivey's world. This unexpected experience was no simulation, for the first time I knew what it was truly like to be Ivey.
You don't?
Completed in 1956, the catalog written by James Archer Abbott to accompany a 2010 exhibit at Evergreen Museum & Library, "Baltimore's Billy Baldwin," describes the walls and wood panelled wainscot painted in two tones of the same light fawn color, and upholstery fabric in red silk damask on a sofa and arm chair, with oxblood colored leather seats on the Queen Anne and Rococo side chairs. A single scroll-arm easy/wing chair read as tribute to the departed Mr. Woodward, noted the catalog. Baldwin personally selected the furnishings with approval from Mrs. Woodward, and it is believed that many if not all may have come from Woodward houses, according to Abbott who has done extensive research on the legendary decorator. The false fireplace with an 18th century English chimneypiece was a concession by Baldwin who generally thought such a feature was a sign of bad taste, notes author Abbott. Several Persian carpets also added to atmosphere of a private home. One of the most innovative features, created with the help of Baldwin's friend Joseph B.Platt who designed Hollywood sets, was a recess around the perimeter of the room's dropped plaster ceiling that concealed the illumination that washed the walls with light. eliminating the usually distracting lighting of the time. Today, the rugs and some of the furnishings have been removed to allow the room to easily be adapted for use for special events, and the adjacent lobby, also designed by Baldwin, is now a catering pantry.
Bigfoot Lodge, Oldfields Liquor Room and Bigfoot West). Like those
I must have looked baffled, because she attempted an explanation, "Da girls of mine be only 70 and 72, but dey be tired all da time. Och!"
Speaking of clumsy—today at the coffee shop, I may or may not have knocked a framed record off the wall. Glass shattered, people stared, and I turned beet red, slumped into my seat, and cursed my elbows.
I can, however, give you a little explication on my attitude toward ebooks: If you like them, great. If you fear them, relax. No one, at least in the world of the public library, is going to force you to use them instead of old-fashioned print books. And I think all the doomsayers who predict the end of Civilization As We Know It are wallowing in their own bitterness and I just don’t see the point. Sure, civilization as we know it is changing. That’s what it does. Some of the changes are good, others not so much. But constantly calling out all new developments as harbingers of evil is just tiring. And sad. Who wants to be angry all the time? If you only want to read books on paper, knock yourself out.
their arms
Well that Mayan Doomsday thing is coming, and the last time this growth of groups happened it was about Y2K.
Q: Before becoming an artist, have you ever been such a fan of someone that you did things like putting his/her poster up on the wall, or collecting his/her photos?
Quest Level: 30+
Current events in Bangkok, Thailand sort of a déjà vu of April 2009: once again present government of so called “Democrat” party has declared an State of Emergency (SOE) to handle the situation caused by anti-government protests and army are preparing to use force for this crackdown, while “red-shirts” (UDD) are mobilizing more people to confront them. Although it is reported that “PM emergency rule would not mean an imminent crackdown on protesters“. According to Emergency declaration among other goals it was mentioned : “to stop any attempt to disseminate false information in a way to incite division…”, which is translated into controlling Media and any sources of information (from Twitter):
The Office – Still funny after all these years. Jim & Pam’s wedding was everything we could have asked for. From The Michael Scott Paper Company to the return of Ryan to Creed’s increasing creepiness, every episode of The Office is still filled the kind of laughs we always expect from the folks at Dunder Mifflin.
He was casting a portion of blame in regards to dissent at the door of the refereeing establishment.
Right now I am sitting at my home in Karad, writing this post. It’s cloudy out there with occasional rain. Mom is planning about cooking somethingi like but I am going to tell her to make something simple.
I was telling my sister last night it really brings me joy to see my dog Brooklyn play & enjoy himself with his toys. It seems as if he’s never had any toys before!
City Councilman Michael Reynolds took the time to thank Joel Ann (none of the other council members did) and complimented her for doing everything correctly. He sounded sad, though. I think he sees the handwriting on the wall. I am also quite skeptical, since I know how Greenville County is, when they want some ordinary person's land: ruthless. But I am hopeful... Joel Ann is a good person who has done much excellent work in the community and has many friends. Chancey Lindsey-Peake of Banana Manna breads, made a statement of support, explaining that Joel Ann has provided a working livelihood to many local vendors and small businesspeople like herself.
Hubby however...
Friday: Bake, ice and add fondant decorations
Kansas City’s Mayor Pro Tem, Cindy Circo will officially declare March 24, 2012 as “ViSalus Day” during the ViSalus National Training Conference at the Kansas City Convention Center. Kansas City has hosted numerous ViSalus training conferences since 2007, bringing in millions of dollars in local revenue. More than 15,000 people are expected to attend the three-day conference the weekend of March 23, which will bring an estimated $5 million into the city’s economy. Kansas City is honoring ViSalus for fulfilling its mission to promote life, health and prosperity worldwide and for the economic impact it has made in the Kansas City community.
- foster and adoptive parents! Mark and I have some dear friends who are currently waiting to become foster parents, and we also have some friends who are currently going through the process of adoption. I know their journeys aren't easy. I'm so thankful that they are answering God's call to love these special children! Praying for them always!
Jeremiah 17:9 The heart is deceitful above all things, and desperately wicked: who can know it? So, that advice from the world to "follow your heart" is WRONG according to the TRUTH of God's Word. When your heart tells you that there isn't a way to resolve the big ugly sore in your marriage....don't listen. Grab the hand of your spouse, forget all that is causing the problem and shift your focus on the Bible. Find a God fearing preacher who can lead you through wisdom based on the Scripture and watch God put your lives back together in PERFECTION. I've seen it happen, and I know God is the ONLY Refuge, the ONLY Hope.
We find it surprising that no one else deduced Mr. von Niederhoffentanger’s lack of familial ties.
Ask yourself and your clients the following questions.
Maybe young white guys have a fetish of some sort I just haven't noticed. It doesn't appear to be sneakers though. Perhaps it's video games?
Hats off to Arakawa Hiromu for creating this amazing manga!!!
It is for this kind of person; Christ Jesus came into the world. Here is what we read in Hebrews 2:18, “For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour (help) them that are tempted.” Later in Hebrews 4:15 we read that He “was in all points tempted like as we are, yet without sin.” Paul wrote in 1 Corinthians 10:13, “There hath no temptation taken you but such as is common to man; but God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be tempted above that ye are able; but will with the temptation also make a way to escape, that ye maybe able to bear it.”
I couldn't.
There was an interesting article in Life Extension recently talking about how the Standard American Diet is linked to increased risk of depression and other health issues. Hmmm, could that be why it’s called SAD?
If a person’s relationship breaks down next week and he or she has a 12 year old child, he or she will not be entitled to receive lone parent’s allowance. The Minister acknowledged this last week. If that person has or is considering getting a part-time job, he or she will become disadvantaged and will be encouraged to return to full dependency on social welfare, given the lack of adequate, affordable or even free – it should be free, since it is free in Sweden – child care. Other people will be affected as the various phases of these cuts kick in during the coming year as envisaged in Bill.
Hope everyone had a wonderful Father's Day today.
Enjoy cooking with your kids & using some more of last seasons garden produce. :) While you are at it, why don't you invite some friends or neighbors over and have a party like the soldiers and peasants did in the book. Happy Garden Eating! :)
- The recipe produces 1200 g of dough, which makes 8 rolls @150 g each. These bake up into fairly large rolls, suitable for sandwiches. You could also make a dozen rolls at 100 g each, which would give you a generous dinner roll.
By 5:15 A.M. the streaming stimuli slowed, and the city slept more soundly. Then the radio squawked "shooting," with EMS units on the way, calling for a transport.
Joan Allen (The Crucible)
I have nothing new to rant about anymore; because I’m pretty sure I’ve covered all that since 2007 in every one of my Merdeka blog posts. I have nothing positive to quip about either. The 18-going-on-19 year old me is pretty jaded, and I find that these days, I just don’t feel anymore.
So, I'll just keep breathing...for now, anyway...
21-15-9 Reps For Time::
4. Serve in glasses and garnish with lemon slice or raspberries
The online options are fairly robust though very similar to the Street Fighter 4 series online options, with the standard ranked, unranked lobby options. I am quite pleased that you are able to play co-op online with both someone locally and online (I believe for 360 owners you can’t have a local friend playing with you online, which really sucks). Scramble mode is also available online though only unranked, which makes sense as it’s more of a party mode. The replay channel is lifted straight from Super Street Fighter 4, which allows you to save and watch replays of your choosing, I do think it would have been cool to have Youtube sharing like in Street Fighter 3 Third Strike Online Edition. Still there is a pretty solid amount of game mode options that will keep most people busy for a while. Strangely enough my online experience has been a mostly positive one, with lag being pretty good most of the time although got some hiccups here and there, however it can take a while to find games. There have been however several glitches that have been making the online experience not so pleasant. The most common was a sound glitch that caused the sound to cut out through the duration of the match, which was pretty annoying but this glitch has since been patched out. There are other glitches that players have encountered like one which has Megaman flying off the screen, however I’ve personally only encountered the sound glitch.
-Materials
It's been well known that I am completely jealous and would love to go too. But we just don't have the money. So I had this crazy daydream that hubby somehow found the money and was gonna surprise me too. It was a silly daydream that I knew would not happen......until I saw the dining reservation confirmation his aunt had made and it said 4 guests instead of the three I knew about going on the trip- her two daughters and their one friend. (I'd let her use my email address to make ressies) And one was for one of my favorite places- BOMA!
I know that technically "ugh" is probably not a word, but it's the only one I have that adequately sums up how I feel right now.
A few days ago I was lucky enough to attend the media preview for the event. I'm going to just give you my picks from the preview and a few other tidbits since time is running short (I'll be heading down to the fest after I write this post)
I formed an easel card out of Bazzill dark teal and pine green cardstock, Bo Bunny a gift of love Mama-Razzi stripe and aperture. Punch Bunch elongated leaves, mini sun and stamen, combined with McGill branch and EK Success paper shaper punches in daisy, small daisy and snowflake made it easy for me to use coordinating Copic colors in my attempt to create some handmade paper lily flowers.
My wife has had a bit of a transformation as of late. As I have previously posted, she has lost somewhere near a gazillion pounds and fits into the dress size she wore on our wedding day. She let her hair grow out and got it styled. She wears clothes that compliment her figure. For a body that gave birth to nine bouncing babies, she looks pretty darn good. The contacts were the last addition to a lovely transformation.
Every time you finish a task, you can get bonus items. These items, when completed, can yield items that can include energy boosts.
Badr El-Kaddouri, Mo Bangura, Adam Matthews and Victor Wanyama have yet to show anything of promise.
My married voice took a while coming.
But the other point is that Anti-Whites have never let a little thing like reality get in the way of their sick agenda. They say they are Anti-Racist. What they really are is Anti-White. Anti-Racist is just a CODE WORD for Anti-White!
About a year later, Saint Peter came to the woman and asked her to watch the Gates of Heaven for him that day.
Round 15: (Knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together) repeat brackets across round, knit 2 stitches on the end. (14 stitches)
Remove sieve and pour the ground almonds and salt on top of the flour mixture.
And it did, after a lot a pushing (it was really only twenty minutes, but I was sure I was pushing out a cube van) into the world came a demure 6lb 15 oz baby girl. A girl, our girl.
Ideas that directly challenge corporate orthodoxy can be excluded from public debate at the same time that a debate among two or more “acceptable” ideas rages. To provide an example, at the end of the 1990s a strong debate played out in the mass media outlets of the United States concerning the Vietnam War. This debate had all the appearances of a serious dissection of a bloody, deeply divisive blot on U.S. history. But although the debate was heated and lively, it was only between two “acceptable” viewpoints — an honorable effort that tragically failed or a well-intentioned but flawed effort that should not have been undertaken if the U.S. was not going to be “serious” about fighting.
About 13 years ago a young pregnant married girl asked me why I ‘crafted’ so much.
Repeat until coupons are gone. :)
2) John Piper’s Masculine Christianity There is certainly a masculine feel to Christianity; but does this masculine feel necessarily exclude an equal female feel? Aren’t there aspects of the Christian faith that have a feminine feel to them…and should we also seek to promote these?
Every year in the late 60's early 70's Xmas day wasn't complete without a large carboard stocking covered in red netting that was full of little plastic toys and weird lollies. One of the things I did play with out of these toys that mostly only lasted the one day was the pick up sticks. Little pin ball machines and sliding squares puzzles also sometimes lasted more than the day .
* Salford Council, which is trimming care spending by 9.9 per cent. It is proposing cutting 87 jobs and requiring some people to make a contribution towards their care;
Next up, 3 more project submissions and then they will make their final selections on March 30th.
People are rational and no rational person will ever feel any close connection with this structure. They will be proud of their house because it conforms to the general description of what a house should look like. There's a reason why everyone wears skinny glasses in one decade and skinny ties in another, all doing it at the same time as if on command. People will look the same kind of weird if they think that looking weird makes them look normal.
Stay tuned for more pics and updates as we wrap up what has been an amazing trip.
to a private bed chamber
Aneesh Chopra is the U.S. Chief Technology Officer and Assistant to the President and Associate Director for Technology at the Office of Science and Technology Policy
Arngrim
The Agent has no part of this. I am in charge of packing and unpacking the house. He is charge of packing and unpacking the garage, and with moving everything. I am completely happy with this arrangement. I get to be in charge of where everything goes.
I'm insane about miniature details, so let me show you the gold fabric paint and micro beads I added to the silk netting. I also embellished the floral belt with tiny seed beads and gold micro beads. In her lap is a tiny crocheted mouse I got from Christine at Dandelion Fair, http://www.etsy.com/shop/DandelionFair.
I've been sufficiently productive.
Pour the mixture into a cheesecloth or tea towel inside a sieve, set on top of a bowl or measuring cup. Leave the mixture until all the liquid is strained out (do not squeeze). Combine the strained rosehip pulp with another 2 cups of water in the pan, stir a little, and strain again this time squeezing until there is no more liquid.
Where is Ryan Seacrest???
In tiny clues that would have taxed even most Clearseers, he followed Rissad's trail; a pebble that had scratched the floor as it rebounded from the other man's boot, a drop of water diverted from its path by grease transferred from his skin where he'd stopped to lean on the wall. Rel spared thought for a grim, tight smile. Let Dora and Taslin try to follow his trail this way. Even Taslin probably couldn't manage that.
Grover Norquist announced that all the right is looking for is a person who has no voice in policy and decision-making as the Conservatives will call those shots. All they need is a man with 5 digits that can sign their wishes into law and any Bill that is passed to him. They only need the signature of a man who will be their President. In other words they are looking for a puppet president.
The Garifuna descend from escaped African slaves and Caribbean natives. They trace their origins to an 18th century shipwreck of the island of St. Vincent. Garifuna live in marginalized communities in Honduras, Belize, Nicaragua and Guatemala. Their language is vanishing. Their African derived religion–dügü–is largely clandestine. There are few of the old paranda troubadours, like Aurelio’s father. Garifuna rhythms survive in watered down form in punta rock songs, but elders feel that the old culture is disappearing before their eyes.
and who I have to wash in secret because he loves the smell so much.
Because these “ripe” races are harvested, there is room for life to continue. We would not be here if not for the extinction of the dinosaurs and the Protheans. The cycle must continue. The cycles of creation, destruction, and rebirth are seen in many myths, such as the Aztec and Hindu religions. It’s nasty, necessary work, but the Reapers exist to make sure the cycle continues. As the Catalyst said, they are the solution to chaos.
Mr O’Neewl ignored him.
This question has been asked because of the words of Christ in John 17:12, “While I was with them in the world, I kept them in thy name: those that thou gavest me I have kept, and none of them is lost, but the SON OF PERDITION (Where else is this phrase found in the Bible); that the Scripture might be fulfilled.”
Nothing to buy as of yet, just content yourself with listening below
Full Sail Brewing Company / Tasting Room and Pub Old Boardhead Barleywine Ale
The Sixers open with five games on the road and Collins plans to utilize the team’s youth and depth to keep them competitive. He believes that Nikola Vucevic will be the only new addition to the rotation and the familiarity should translate into wins.
So many questions are triggered by this - but before you take a look at the two labels (shown below) - here are the questions I'd most like to focus on...
Like I said, it was a relief.
I am worried that today’s kids don’t know how to think. Yes, they know how to take tests well, and of course they can fill out packets of worksheets like champs, but how well do they think? How much time do you spend in your classroom on analysis, criticism, and critical thinking? How many classic novels do kids read in middle and high school that are followed up with valuable discussion? We all know it’s important for teachers to reflect, but do we teach reflection to our students and give them time and require them to complete the same exercise?
Prof. Stanislav Prozorov highlighted the significant role of the Ismaili interpretation of Islam in the religious and political history of the Muslim world and its contribution to the world spiritual heritage. He particularly welcomed the choice of St. Petersburg as the venue for the conference, considering its glorious past as the capital of Imperial Russia and a birthplace of Russian Oriental Studies, including the systematic study of the culture, traditions and written heritage of Central Asian Muslims.
Oh, and on a side note, I think this image has convinced me to do something I've been thinking about for years - paint my baseboards the same color as the walls. However, I won't do that until the following on-going projects are finished:
In between having an important "evening meal" (a pork pie and a pack of crisps) we ended up having 3 of the Gambit each. All the time the pub was filling up with punters, and before we knew it, not only was it 21.00 but Wee Keefy was in with his work colleagues. Mr H had to escape home but I stayed for another half, this time the Revolutions Overkill Rhubarb Wheat beer. I had eyed this up with caution even though I rate Revolutions, but I needn't have worried - this was a fantastic quenching not too chewy not too sweet fruit beer which I wished I'd had enough "real money" to have a pint of.
This weekend I made a bow holder for her. Another one actually, because her current one just can't take another bow! I think I did a pretty good job!
Frost cooled chocolate cupcakes with Marshmallow frosting. If desired, use a kitchen torch to brown the frosting. Top frosted cupcakes with a piece of Hershey's chocolate and a piece of graham cracker.
Hooray for beaming smiles that make my day
4. Michael, Andrew And James
I visited with my sushi partner-in-crime (not the husband, since he's not so much into the fish). The service was attentive and friendly, the food was fresh and delightful, and the atmosphere is cozy and comfortable.
Please pray that these families will be comforted in the days to come. Shannon's family over the loss of their beautiful young daughter. Crew's family in rallying because this baby boy is a miracle. He is given a new health challenge each day and he seems to overcome them. Continue to pray, to share your thoughts about the families and let us know if you have questions or comments. Please feel free to leave them here or e mail us..
I’ll also be sending out prizes to anybody who can email me a photo of themselves wearing the mask in an interesting location. Please: no nude or swimwear photos unless you adhere to this website’s strict guidelines for adult-related material (you must be over 18, under 25, female, buxom yet lithe, preferably double jointed, and, if possible wearing rubber spats/stockings/earmuffs whilst in the nude or wearing swimwear).
Corrective measure to racial unity is to help all including the marginalized groups. The case of some ultra and extreme right-wing Malay NGOs and organisations that are vigorously promoting that this country is ‘only meant for one race and one religion’ – when others are forced upon them through the inconvenience of history – is off beamed and a perfidious scheme to distort racial unity.
Days, so no more waiting at the top of the stairs, now waiting for change,
Stay tuned for: My letter to Mark Zuckerberg that MAY OR MAY NOT be doctored to look like it came from the U.S. Government, Mephistopheles Scores an AK-47, Rubber Chicken Puppet Theater (really, WE PROMISE, RIGHT SIRRAH!?!?), and Why I Need a Two Foot Long Rubber Great White Shark.
But at least Yemeni women can drive. It surely hasn’t ended their litany of problems, but it symbolizes freedom — and nowhere does such symbolism resonate more than in Saudi Arabia, where child marriage is also practiced and women are perpetually minors regardless of their age or education. Saudi women far outnumber their male counterparts on university campuses but are reduced to watching men far less qualified control every aspect of their lives.
The voters’ rejection of the BN, like in Kedah, was in a way due to the mistakes made by the coalition, Najib said during a day-long visit to the state.
I wish I hadn't eaten French toast before attending our town fair when I was eleven. Those spinny, whirly rides did me no favours, neither on a social nor digestive level.
Throughout the speech there are references suggesting the future formation of a world government, as the idea itself sounds enticing to the general public.
March 21: Twitter Launch Party. Log into Twitter between 9-10pm EST to have a real time talk with myself and many of the contributors in the book. More details about this event will be posted on my blog as the date approaches.
(I stop singing. Suddenly there is a stretch of open road. Fourth gear, here I come!)
On the evening of April 14th Douglas played the piano at a at a hymn service presided over by Reverend Ernest Carter. After the collision, Norman met Kate Buss and Marion Wright and told them the ship had struck an iceberg but assured them there was no danger.
After lunch we had a March of Dimes fundraiser at CiCi’s pizza but I don’t think we did very well. We didn’t have a great turnout of people we know and we got in trouble for telling people walking in to the restaurant to mention the March of Dimes. oh well. We tried!
And, Mom dearly LOVED having tea.
*THE FOLLOWING RELEASE IS A DRAFT FOR USE BY MEDIA; COMMUNICATIONS DIRECTOR AMYRE LOOMIS- OR THE PERSON LISTED AS THE CONTACT WITHIN THE RELEASE- SHOULD BE CONTACTED AT (718) 260-9191 FOR MOST UPDATED RELEASE*
Neither do we.
After the tour, we had the opportunity to view a short video about gold mining in the Yukon during the early 20th century. The video contained some fascinating black and white footage of a dredge in operation.
Try as you might to hurl the pebbles back, I am not made of glass. I'm Teflon. I'd rather my own company than suffer yours. It's all good. Pretending you don't exist.
Risk factors that may decrease absorption of some B vitamins include smoking; excessive use of alcohol; surgical removal of portions of the digestive tract; and advanced age. Absorption is also impaired by some medications.
I do so love it when someone asks you what your favorite *anything* is and then proceeds to immediately discredit you as though you're some sort of retard.
Statistics reveal that one out of every four students are bullied, picked on, or abused each month. In addition, 30% of students in the United States admit to being bullies, victims of bullies, bystanders of bullying or have participated in all three roles.
There has also been a dramatic increase in the cross-border violent live-stock rustling incidents by large, heavily-armed Sotho-citizens, many former gold-miners, who are targetting Afrikaner farmers along the borders of Lesotho.
Along comes Giuseppe Piazzi, an Italian monk and hobby astronomer. After dutifully scanning the heavens, on the first night of the new millennium, January 1st, 1801, he observes a tiny "star" where none had been before. He follows it night-to-night and observes it moving...at first it was thought to be a comet, but after careful calculation astronomers realize this is exactly what they've been looking for. It is dubbed Planet Ceres. All is well, and astronomers pat themselves on the back for being so very clever.
I have started Book #5:
5:30-5:40 - Pick up Sir from daycare, drive home while he screams in the back seat. How a content baby goes from being happy at daycare to wanting a bottle ASAP in the car I have no idea. It's obviously the evil car seat that bites him.
But that is to be expected. From Tony Blair – First World – all the way down to Najib Razak – of the Altantuya and Scorpene submarines notoriety – is not something to be proud of. It is rather insulting in fact, although fees are fees and it is not clear yet if Campbell is indirectly linked to any firm that may be advising Najib now that another UK firm, FBC Media, is out of the picture, and on the verge of bankruptcy after undertaking a similar sort of public relations job for the Malaysian leader.
I cannot hold on any longer.
It was an unassuming pregnancy, my second pregnancy. More by necessity than by default. I was mothering a newly sprung toddler, who might have been an only child had I not gotten pregnant before the 14 month turn he seemed to take.
The majority of people now hold views about Western governments and the nature of power that would’ve made them social pariahs ten or twenty years ago. The majority are now sceptical of the Iraq War; the majority want troops out of Afghanistan; the majority resent the banks and financial sector and blame them for the financial crisis; most people are now aware of environmental issues, more than ever before, and despite denialist confusion promulgated by elements of fossil fuel industries, the majority in the US and Britain are deeply concerned about global warming; most people are wary of conventional party politics and disillusioned with the mainstream parliamentary system, due to the continuation of scandal after scandal. In other words, on a whole range of issues, there has been a massive popular shift in public opinion toward a progressive critique of the current political economic system. It is, of course, largely subliminal, not carefully worked out, and lacks a coherent vision for what needs to be done – but there can be little doubt that this shift has happened, and is deepening.
This week was a real mess. We got a lot of new missionaries in and
The violins have these butterflies of melody (at the start, and at 00:45)- the piano catches its breath a few times, skips a beat and goes crazy (01:05-01:15) - the bandoneones enclose you in a swirling, disorienting, obsessed wall of sound, especially when the voice comes in after 01:40. What a dark voice (apparently Armando Laborde, recording dated 1953). The sung melody has a little change at 02:30 like a plea. It's telling you to dance along the edge of chaos.
Here is a poem that Margaret wrote many years ago for one of her sweethearts, and gave to me:
Put simply: God did not and does not desire either animal or human sacrifice to forgive us because God is not against us but for us. In fact, according to the anti-sacrifice prophets to suggest that ritual sacrifice is necessary for God to shift from being against us to being for us is to worship a false god, an idol, a deity of violence rather than a deity of chesed (compassion). This means that Jesus died because of the reconciliation system established by humanity that seeks unity through the scapegoating violence of ritual sacrifice. By contrast, God’s reconciliation system seeks unity through the compassionate grace of spoken words of blessing and forgiveness extended to all—even to enemies and persecutors.
What the said section does provide is if the “meeting or procession is not likely to be prejudicial to the interest of the security of Malaysia or any part thereof or to excite a disturbance of the peace”, the officer in charge of the police district will issue a licence.
Only ate after forcing myself to get small take away.
The man raised his hand and nodded in acknowledgment and confirmation, took the bags, found a cab, loaded them in the trunk and waited. Jorrie headed back towards the ticket counter and baggage check area and started waiting, to make his move.
1 TBLS white vinegar (or unseasoned rice vinegar if you have it)
The last show I’m watching is Desperate Housewives and I admit I’m glad this is the final season. This is one of those shows that I started watching several years ago and have continued to watch simply because I want to see how it ends. I’m ready to move on. This is also how I felt with Lost. It seems you can only keep a show interesting for so long.
A sliver of light from the partly open door to their father's study lay on the wall of the hallway. They headed toward it, Sam's bow and quiver bouncing as she walked. Her stomach tensed. The Xenith kids would be in a whole new league. They were the best in the world. Would she measure up? Or would she let her father down, embarrass him in front of their mother?
Finish: Short and adds nothing different to the palate. Balanced between sweetness and dry woodyness. Simple but tasty.
Katie is a twelve year old girl hiding in the barn.
From the kitchen... Just a snack as late now. I am thinking I will go and make a hot chocolate drink with marshmallow topping and a little cinnamon!
A years-long investigation into a violent street gang that police say terrorized a Flint neighborhood for a decade has triggered criminal charges against 22 Flint-area men, authorities announced today.
(Ojibway) and Haudenosaunee (Iroquois) Peoples of Southern Ontario. There is something so beautiful, sophisticated, and poetic about trail marker trees. It is incredible to think in this age of frenzied, electronic communication, that living‘, natural messages so simple and practical are still standing on the landscape today — a centuries old tap on the shoulder pointing us the way home. Reaching back to a time before the car, before roads and lights, when sticking to the forest trail was crucial to survival, and a wrong turn could spell danger or death. For these reasons, I would argue that our oldest trail marker
“To my mind such organisation must be formed immediately especially before the coming 13th general election.
Why small end down? I am told that it is to keep the yolk from settling against the shell, but I haven't found documentation of it.
Finally, a very interesting question was asked by the audience. We forward this question to the SPC blog as the Question of the Day: The question is the following: according to ArtM 5 an SPC should confer the same rights as conferred by the basic patent. As a consequence, the effects of an SPC must not be broader than the effect of the respective basic patent. For example, an SPC for a compound A cannot be granted if the basic patent claims only A plus B. If such an SPC was granted, the SPC, in addition to the effects of the basic patent, would also protect against A, A plus C and so forth. So far, this is more or less undisputed. However, if a basic patent claims A and A plus B, and an SPC has been granted for A plus B, does this SPC protect also against A? We are very keen to receive the answers of the members of the SPC blog on this question. We have learned that two further SPC seminars are being offered by the FORUM Institute. One seminar, in English, will be held on 4 and 5 October 2012 in Amsterdam. A second seminar, in German, will be held on 23 and 24 October 2012 in Frankfurt. Further details will be provided once they are available.
LOS ANGELES, CALIFORNIA, United States of America. |Tuesday, May 01, 2012| 11 AM PST #INTERNATIONAL
I use a cup bur with my Dremel. All I do is put the end of the ear wire into the cup and the bur files the wire to a nice smooth end. If you do not have a Dremel or Flex shaft, there is a nifty little hand tool that also works pictured below. A fine file will work, but is time consuming.
This, I am beginning to see, is the wonder of poetry. It is, usually, a short collection of words that consternate us. We don't know what the poet means, and it frustrates us. But oftentimes, there is something there that grasps us, and won't let us go. We go back to the text over and over again, turning over the thoughts that are evoked by that text, and finding over time that meaning emerges, insights we simply could not access in the first or second or third readings. And sometimes, this portal becomes an entrance into a world of meaning that has laid in wait for us.
We want to see emphasis on your sentiment, let it be the focal point of your card.
Like any bureaucracy, public or private, once a department or agency has fulfilled its mandate, it must seek greater fields to harvest. Smaller concerns yield greater power which morphs into an over- regulating Nanny environment. Bureaucracies must grow to increase their budgets and their power. Eventually they metastasize into tyrannical behemoths that cannot be thwarted no matter how silly or harmful their rulings may be. Proponents of the “Food Safety Act” cite the necessity for limiting the damage to people from e-coli, salmonella and other nasty things that are infrequently found in our food supply. Hallelujah! We need never fear the ravages of sickness or death again because the all-knowing, all-caring and reasonably restrained FDA (Food and Drug Administration) is on the job.
Kirsty and Emilie grouped our informations together, and picked which hillwalks we would use for this business.
There is another reason that I've begun to crave seeing more older movies in theaters. Simply put: I haven't been able to find enough time to be able to make much progress with my Netflix queue. These past few weekends, I always seem to find myself wrapped up in other practical matters I need to attend to (income taxes being one of them); also, my work schedule makes it so that I pretty much have no time to sit through feature films on DVD in the evenings. All in all, I think it's been almost a month since I last watched a DVD from Netflix. A month! And because I'm often in New York at least one day of my weekends in order to catch up on theatrical releases, I find I can only fit in one DVD a week, if that.
3. Brezhoneg Raok
Hi there ladies, I thought it was well overdue to do a little review about The Body Shop mascara Big and Curvy. Over the xmas period i have been alternating between false lashes and mascara on days when I'm feeling lazy. It is so hard to find the perfect mascara and i love reading other peoples reviews on them.
But your house is barren, and the path
It would save a vital part of Scotland’s heritage, as Mr Salmond described it, and would rescue the “most successful football team in world football”. We have already seen all the arguments deployed regarding the financial “benefits” to Scottish football of Rangers surviving.
Thanks to all those new and old loyal followers and comments- they inspired me to get back to blogging.
So a few months ago, I was so excited to get this amazing bed frame from a local thrift store. When I got it home, I hurried and put it together to surprise my husband when he got home.
Hiding underneath is some gorgeous Amy Butler that I managed to get for £5 a metre. I had my eye on it last year to make a skirt or dress. Really glad I waited now as I love a bargain. I just need to find the dress pattern that I've got in mind and I'm sure I'll get going one day soon.
- Saint Christol
* management would like to clarify that no one is seriously advocating physical harm. Maybe just throwing something soft, like a rolled up sock, at the t.v. screen. Ok?
Anne Hayes (Con) 129
Instead, I want to encourage you to see Scripture as a secret. Read it as a story that God has revealed to you, giving you special insight into the world and where you fit in this world. It’s a secret… except it’s one we’re instructed to make known to everyone who will listen!
Each night before the girls go to bed we read from our scripture reader, read some stories and then say a prayer together as a family. After that the girls brush their teeth and go to bed. Tonight as I was leaving I's room, she asked "Mummy say prayers?". She wanted to say her own prayers. It was so beautiful that she asked. I haven't gotten to the stage of teaching her to say her own prayers, mostly because I thought she was too young.
Surprisingly, the Urgent Care I went to was also a Pediatric Clinic, so there were lots of little ones when I arrived this morning. I was sitting in my chair, filling out the barrage of paperwork, when a nine year old boy came in with his father. You could tell the boy was not feeling well, as he was curled up in his chair, leaning on his dad. A girl, who looked about seven years old sat a few rows away watching him. Within about five minutes of him arriving, this little girl walked over with her blanket that she had around herself and asked the boy, “Would you like my cover?” She was there to be examined as well, but saw the state of this boy and offered up her comfort to him. It was so beautiful to watch as he accepted her offer and managed to crack a small smile in the process.
Okay--the first 4 pictures are of 2 doilies that J made a while back. I finally bought some blocking mat thingies so she was able to block her doilies. I think they turned out so lovely.
Oh wait, didn't you enthusiastically accept that same exact offer? If memory serves me correctly that offer was accepted when you agreed to "crush those union bastards" for your (fake) buddy David Koch.
Oh, and thank you to the handless organist. Truly, truly a miracle.
The week after this happened to me I booked a one-hour massage session and it helped to take the kinks out of my knotted muscles at least, so I've booked a few more sessions with her before the holidays.
“I drive one of them,” Akerson says. “I’ve now put 3,000 miles on my car. I’ve used one gallon of gas.” One gallon consumed over the course of 3,000 miles works out to, well, 3,000 miles per gallon if consumption of electricity is purposely omitted from the equation. Regardless, Akerson’s Volt is a stranger to gasoline.
Challenge Finale – Endurance challenge – Stand on a log holding a golden ticket to the finale. Jeremy talks and talks and talks to try to psych out Lauren and Mike. Eventually they go to one hand, then to one foot.
The beer and food lineup will be continually updated on the festival website. The Altman building, located at 135 West 18th Street, is a special events space that long housed the now-defunct B. Altman department store.
And then as I was walking out, my therapist said my children will not grow up with the pain that I endured, and I lost it. Cause really, isn’t that what I want? Yes I deserve to be happy, and I will be, but this Mama Bear is protecting her cubs above all.
This one is all wood. The card that came with it says the colors are all natural, no stains, dyes or paint. (www.woodquilter.net) There were several Christmas things in the bag (there always are!) and I have put most of that up, but I'm keeping the ornaments out in my sewing room so I an enjoy them all year.
Below I’ll summarize some of the biggest problems:
Scrap paper in different colors
How do you show the LOVE on your door in February?
I don’t have rummage sales, either, because I make a pig’s breakfast out of all that I use and wear so there’s not much left that could be saleable. I use mixing bowls and hand mixers to blend concrete for stepping-stones. I clean the bathtub in work clothes, splashing bleach on my favorite shirts. I draw on important documents, turn down pages on books, and wrap sick dogs in my good sheets. (I can feel my mother’s spirit sigh in frustration with her messy, careless daughter.) At my advanced age, you would think there would be a pause button that said, “STOPPPPPPP!!”
I sulked for a couple of hours, bummed it hadn't turned out as fabulous as I imagined it in my mind.
Forget Carroll, next stop Bergen Street.
so cool back in 1972.
"What we've got here is... failure to communicate." That classic line from the movie Cool Hand Luke has been quoted and misquoted for decades, but it still rings true... even in marital relationships. I see young couples struggle with communication, especially when the honeymoon period is coming to an end. After a quarter of a century with the best gal this side of heaven, we still seem to occasionally have failures to communicate.
but let me not be put to shame;
Primo was laughing. I guess he was right - what can you do with this stuff but laugh? We're dealing with crazy people.
Chart: Stockings 'A Plenty - Reindeer
Press your lips to mine
Well we are into the second week of Spring, that means many of us men are beginning to come out of winter hibernation and experiencing the dreaded joy of allergy season along with spring cleaning and landscaping duties. The bright side of this time of the year is that if you can control your allergies its the perfect time to enjoy the outdoors.
So, what to do with your empty compartment? I recommend filling it with the Illustrator's Four Food Groups, the seasonal version of those being:
Anyway, got there early and headed for the cafeteria for the Seattle’s Best coffee they serve there. What I should have done was have something to eat (and you’ll see why), but I only had 15-20 minutes until my appointment. They also have free wifi, and I’ve been known to publish posts while sitting right there. Getting there early allows my body a chance to settle from the drive, as well. I’ve been rejected from donating before because of my temperature being a little elevated. By the way, having coffee right before having your temperature taken does not help at all. Luckily, I brought from home a large water bottle of iced tea I started to guzzle when the technician reminded me that hot coffee = a no no. Yes, I was being difficult. Apparently, a lot of donors were being “difficult” that day. At least she was laughing.
Place 1/4 cup warm water in the bowl of an electric mixer. Mix in yeast and sugar and allow to stand for 5 minutes until foamy.
Carol left a comment asking about where to get the Copic color chart. I believe it's on the Copic website but I had it in a folder on my desk top so I hope it's okay with Copic to share it with you here. Click on the photo to make it larger and then right click on your mouse to get a drop down menu, go down the menu to "save image as" and click, it's yours. I save this kind of stuff on my desktop so it's easy for me to find after downloading it. Enjoy!
Mark your calendars for April 25 and a WORLD MALARIA DAY event that’s educational and fun for all ages. You’ll learn about the disease, see mosquito nets in action, and find out ways you can help.
Have you ever seen a really bad DIY wedding movie before with shakey footage, poor sound/audio quality with no editing whatsoever? This 4-hour informative, fun seminar will teach you how to DIY a wedding video the RIGHT way, in which a professional videographer will be filming a series of enactments of a ceremony, entrance into the reception, toasts, cake cutting and first dance. Attendees will see on a screen in real time what is being filmed, with narration of the right and wrong way to do it. There will also be a demonstration of how to edit.
WHAT UP! Man it’s the 14th isn’t it. I’ve been so lazy and sleeping so much lately it’s insane. I’ll be like “oh I should blog today” and then just fall asleep and wake up and it’s like 1 in the morning so i just go to bed. I’m pretty sure the last post I put up I was falling asleep and I don’t even remember typing it hahaha. I just remember doing it. I don’t even know why I’ve been so tired. Like I will wake up at a decent time and still fall asleep around 9 or 10 and then just go to bed. i’m pretty sure that’s what I did last night and some how didn’t get out of bed today until like 11:50… I’m not sick or anything I feel fine… perhaps I am just dying. I don’t know. and I’m not depressed or anything… I’m content… I just don’t know!
All of us crafters who will be participating in DISNEY WEEK will provide a list of all our friends also posting Disney projects this week. You can visit as many as you'd like at your convenience.
That is the title Autonomous Mind gives his piece today on the status of local government in 2011. I said much the same on Friday to a council official dealing with my complain about Jacobs bailiffs, noting his reluctance to accept our allegations that agents employed by the council were acting unlawfully.
Tips to live by: If a guy declares that he can’t live without you, Run! Unless you’re donating an organ to this dude, this is not flattering. This means he has nothing else going for him, no aspirations, no dreams, and nothing interesting to talk about for all eternity but how much he loves you. That gets boring after the ten thousandth time you hear it.
He pulled over once, got the students to stop fighting, and then continued on his route. The fight then started again.
Snug as a bug without rug in the car.
“Come in to the station, darling. We’ll talk then.”
Hello Folks - Happy Monday - I'm not working this work, but not sure what we'll be doing. Have just got back from buying Andrew's new school shoes - I couldn't believe he's size 5 and a half already - he's only 10, and about to go into the last year of primary school. That was £42 on Andrew's shoes this morning, and £53 last week for Eleri shoes and trainers - OMG that's scary when you see it in black and white. Still got to buy some new uniform yet! Oh well, no more craft or jewellery maker buying me thinks :(
Okay sorry, I know, I can't let the Febreze in the vagina go.
If you wash Black hair, you pretty much have to condition it. You also have to grease/oil it, or it will dry right out and if you touch it, it will sound like a gravel driveway with a truck driving over it. I made the unfortunate mistake of assuming I could buy grease in Perth, Australia. Unfortunately, it seems all the Black people live on the East coast. 2 weeks of crunchy hair. Not fun.
Two things occurred in the course of the run:
Whenever I am in the car alone, I listen to podcasts. When I get home I am always excited to tell Alexander, 15, about what I learned from these podcasts because he tends to engage me in great conversations about the topics. I have been trying to get him to listen to This American Life from NPR, one of my favorite podcasts, as I knew he would love the topics too. He kept saying "Yeah, I am planning to." Finally I said, "Just listen to this one so we can talk about it."
In a particularly vulnerable moment Lily pens a letter to God. In the letter she writes, “Women need new paths. To find our way out of the old labyrinths requires more than one lifetime.”
I had fabric that matched the shower curtain in the girls bathroom leftover from years ago. I used the old fabric that I took off as a template for the new fabric.
1/3 cup cream (or additional water)
But that's just the tip of the iceberg. Smout Allen, David Benjamin, and the Arid Lands Institute will be joined in this collaborative, multi-institutional undertaking by:
Labels: Eleventh Records
I kno I shouldn’t laugh but come on man did anyone really think it was comin home????
Ps 35:9 And my soul shall be joyful in the Lord: it shall rejoice in His salvation.
Though he is known mostly for his "pachuco" series and the "bato" paintings, he showed us some of his newer work using textures and different mediums and it is all stunning. It has the absolute flavor of South Texas, from using rattlesnake skins to painting dust devils to his subjects who make the area what it is.
There were snakes in the open plan kitchen/dining.
Makana was hit in the head with a brick in December while investigating allegations that Mohloana and other ANC officials were duplicating tags for bogus voting delegates for the ANC’s provincial conference.
If you think this morning has a September 12, 2008 smell and feel to it… You are right. Complete and total CDS bloodbath in sovereigns and fins means a global bailout may not be imminent, but the market sure demands it as contagion has been upgraded to gangrene. Bernanke has now officially blown it with the twist and Mr. Market demands a $1 trillion+ LSAP, or else…
raspberries for six months. It was then bottled with yeast so a
First, let's start out with a little reminder of what our kitchen looks like:
But I can tell you one thing. I can tell you when I'm most happy. I'm most happy, most at peace, when the choices that other people make or what they say, do not affect how I feel about myself. And that has come about by detaching myself from external praise and criticism, and trusting my inner Self.
Great Divide - No food, very small, just one bartender and they rarely have beer on tap that you can't find at every liquor store in town. But that doesn't matter. Its still one of my favorite places to grab a beer. The people are great, they will almost always give you a tour if you want one and you can get more good beer here for $5 than just about anyplace I've ever been.
Sure I haven’t really had any GD since I am me most the time but in its place has come lots of guilt and major worries of other kinds.
* Volunteered at the St. George Marathon
SHE: I dunno what do YOU want to do..?
This glaze is definitely my new best friend. The chicken came out with a subtle hint of orange with an asian flare. It went supurbly with the quinoa and stir fry veggies. E loves orange chicken at Pei Wei, so this satisfied his taste buds without all of the fried not-so-goodness that comes with the Pei Wei version. This was by far the easiest at home asian inspired meal I've ever made, and probably just earned a spot in our regular dinner lineup!
Before whereof your friends may well bemoan,
He has time-travelled all his life and is used to the unusual, having spent much of his childhood with his older self, visiting museums and galleries, but he is lost in the face of Clare's assured approach to their first date, because he is besotted with her from the start.
A president's personality comprises a large, but mostly static component of his prestige. The more variable element to his prestige comes from changes in the public image of the presidency, which is to say changes in what the public wants the president to be. These changes are driven by events that affect members of the public, especially negatively, like economic trouble, military conflict, and social unrest. Since presidents have limited influence on such happenings, their prestige depends on their success in managing the hopes of the public. They must teach the public to see their role in a favorable light. But this instruction takes place under four constraints: (1) the public is chronically inattentive, (2) when they are attentive, it is in the context of pressing events not likely to be of the president's choosing, (3) deeds will influence public perception more than words, and (4) how the public understands the president will be influenced by the context of what he has previously done and said. In other words, both events and his own record will compete with the president's attempts to shape public perceptions.
On the bright side, some good priests continue their good missionary efforts!
Whale Bobo humping slobo babe FIN
And then we dine
- If you're not satisfied with the first drawing you do... redraw it. And then redraw it. And then redraw it, pushing the pose, the design, etc, until it's as awesome as it should be. I used to do this a lot, particularly when designing characters for people. But for some reason it never occurred to me to approach comic pages the same way.
I also tucked in the parcel a little pomegranate fob as a special thank you to Lynn for introducing several folk to my blog.
makes two 8-inch cakes
And there’s a lightning storm
Heat your non-stick frying pan on medium high heat.
Yeah. Have I ever mentioned I never eat seafood and certainly never cooked it before. Fortunately it ended up not being so hard. And fortunately the food received quite a bit of compliments. I even didn't mind trying the octopus, although I think the garlic and oregano marinade it was in helped... a lot. I do, however, think the salmon in mustard and dill sauce will start making a regular appearance at home. I'm drooling just thinking about.
I have a great deal of respect for the hon. Gentleman, who is a distinguished member of the Select Committee and who brings years of experience of education to it, so I hesitate to say what I am about to say. However, he is suggesting, as a Labour Member of Parliament, that working-class families involved in home education should be treated with more suspicion than those in better-off areas, that they are not to be trusted with the education of their children, and that inspectors and assessors and all those other people with acronyms should be wandering into their homes, because of — my God — what they might do to their children.
we were on that private beach…
So form drawing... What on earth is it? I thought it was merely a very intelligent precursor to writing and once you were writing then a pleasantly meditative process, kind of like doodling. Rather than reinventing the wheel, I'd prefer to direct your attention to some of the excellent online articles:
* Follow Me (or tell me you already do) (1 entry)
Cenotes are the result of caves collapsing, forming holes in the ground with water in the bottoms of the holes. Because the limestone has so many holes in it, there are no major rivers throughout the entire Yucatan Peninsula. Water runs underground.
To accommodate my laziness and lack of patience...... I baked a 1/2 (stupid stupid me!) recipe pressed into a 8x8 pan lined with parchment, about 1/2 way thru I poked holes and cut the shortbread into 9 pieces.....that I must go hide from my honey because he just walked by and said "those are pretty good cookie thingies".... I will throw him off the trail with mediocre chocolate chip cookies...
I experimented and made him another one out of ribbed sweater jersey and gray thermal knit fabric. I don't really recommend it. Maybe two sweaters would have worked better. At least this hat was free made out of old clothes and extra fabric.
In just a year, most of the fear from that day has faded. But watching something like this brings it all back in an instant.
What about you, what's your mid-week treat?
* Ran the 5K Turkey Trot in American Fork
1 tread
they wanted to know is what I meant by this or that- and whether or not that symbolized this (what would rats eating out someone’s brains really symbolize anyway?) or if I had Kierkegaard in mind when I said this or Freud when I said that and wasn’t it true that and all I could say was the story just meant what it said and my professor having none of that said, quite contemptuously, “I
In closing, I suggest we toast 2011 with the realization that we're all pretty great. Let's get ready to rock it with positive changes and true self-love.
I than explained to her that she now knows the importance of saving her first kiss and that it is not just because mommy says so. God gives us wisdom on how to live a life that is God honoring because he loves us. When we choose to go our own way we are choosing to bring emptiness and a lot of misery into our hearts.
What I really LOVE about blogging is connecting to some really AWESOME people out there: it makes me feel HOPEFUL that people from all over the world are being creative and inspiring and doing some pretty awesome (and cute!) things to go more eco-friendly...
YAMAHA FZ6R FULL RACE EXHAUST HIGHLIGHTS:
Black Stone Flower /Kalapsi- 2
The other day, Nathan and I went shopping. We went to Michael's "just to look" - should of known better, let me tell you. I had to tear myself away from the store, I could do some serious damage in there. I did buy a few cute little crafts for Nathan and Nicholas (since, he will be joining us for craft time this summer). While there I saw some spray stuff that Wilton makes, that you spray on cupcakes or cakes. I've been wanting to try it on some cupcakes, but at $4 something a bottle, I didn't think it was worth it (Did I mention that I'm cheap?). I couldn't bring myself to buy it.
Me: I wish I hadn't gotten this vagina botox.
“I thought. I mean you said it was a present,” I said.
In the first book, Mira and Danaus race from Savannah, U.S. to Aswan, Egypt to London, England; chasing a nightmare from Mira's past while they try to figure out if they can trust each other long enough to save the human race.
But the above example only speaks to the spirit of the law, neglecting the letter. To become a mature American, one must, at some time or another, enjoy a cup of coffee lacking in pretense. Time only permits me to commend a few examples: the gas station cup, the office blend, the vending machine variety, Nescafe (esp. for expatriates, immigrants, and Ameri-philes), yesterday’s grounds. When one happens upon an occasion whence such a cup can satisfy a psychosomatic need, that person can be said to have truly arrived.
Thank you for any comments you may leave, they really do brighten my day.
1 cup chocolate chips (I like using white chocolate chips but you can use dark as well)
5) Everyone is happy. Hey, don't scoff. It could happen.
First, some practical exposure. I traipsed home with a six-pack of "New Grist" gluten-free beer from Lakefront Brewery (http://www.newgrist.com/). This beer won a gold ribbon in the Experimental Beer category at the 2006 Great American Beer Festival, so I thought it stood a good chance of being at least representative of what one might expect from a good gluten-free beer. (And yes, it is considered beer, which is the general label applied to any non-distilled alcoholic beverage that is made from malted grain.)
I never thought of myself as aggressive, but I guess I am. I wonder if that’s a bad thing. Maybe yes and maybe no. Guess it depends on the situation. I think it’s worked well for me most of my life, but there was at least one time when being too aggressive cost me a friend.
I will do my best to win the full approval in God’s sight, as a worker who is not ashamed of his work, one who correctly teaches the message of God’s truth, Amen!
Location: Just off of Cal Oaks on Morning Dove, Murrieta
- And you knew it.
2 tore
and how am I to hold you close
Peel and cut up the carrots, into 2 inch pieces, and spread them across the top of the lamb.
"You Broke My Heart in Little Tiny Pieces" ?
8x8 card
Merely by recommending a client across to us & on our successful introduction of a client to that property i am happy to pay you for the kind introduction of business.
We are dealing with a generation that has seen the cost of college tuition rise 439% over the last 30 years. They went to school and worked hard. Now that they are finished all society has to offer them are low paying service jobs and their old room at their parents house.
On Wednesday, Joe comments on the destructive nature of too much debt in “Debt Can Be Deadly”.
3. You won’t be able to sit properly for a few days/weeks. Recovering from a vaginal delivery is a rough recovery… more so if you tear. Since I tore extensively, I may be a bit biased. But I was sitting on pillows for about 6 weeks. I even had one in the car.
Then we have my tomato garden… they’re coming in! They’re little and green… but it’s a start. A few more weeks and I’ll have yummy ripe red tomatoes to mix in with my salads and add to cheeseburgers. It’s almost grilling season!
Ella laughs. “I guess you must think I’m awfully silly sometimes. I just can’t get out of my head the saying my mother had, which was, ‘Cleanliness is next to godliness.’”
During the divorce she tried to convince me and my brother that our
Some of the materials used included polyurethane flooring over concrete floors, mild steel both raw and powder-coated, natural ash timber veneers and a sandstone gabion wall which adds texture as counterpoint to the black polished steel wall in the lounge.
The president is authorized to use all necessary and appropriate force against those nations, organizations, or persons he determines planned, authorized, committed, or aided the terrorist attacks that occurred on Sept. 11, 2001, or harbored such organizations or persons, in order to prevent any future acts of international terrorism against the United States by such nations, organizations or persons.
I intend to use these buttonholes for the sleeves vents which are meant to be functional. That's another Chanel traits.
“There can only ever be a real reaction, a truthful reaction, when people actually have a chance to see a complete narrative on a particular film,” Jackson told EW.
La Rioja, Argentina
Kissing Kris Kringle… Kris lives in North Pole, Maine where Christmas is the focus of the town’s tourism. The town took a nose-dive when the economy tanked. It’s a few days before Christmas which isn’t exactly Kris’s favorite holiday since both his parents died at an early age in the month of December. After a night of drinking with his two best friends, he vaguely recalled being told he was on Santa’s Naughty List and that he had a penance to pay. The next morning he finds himself on the kitchen floor with a hangover and a strange black bag containing a puppy and a Santa suit. Some crazy voodoo won’t let him leave the house until he puts on the suit. The magic then leads him to the Santa display outside the near-bankrupt department store run by Holly McClaussen. Kris has been attracted to Holly since they were kids, but never acted on it. Since then, she’s been married, divorced and is now a single mom to 5 year old Joy. The only person in town who recognizes Kris in the Santa get up is Holly. They spar a bit which ignites a spark between them. Kris realizes that Holly could use a little help around her house and plays Secret Santa by doing odd fixit things for her. Not only that, but his stint as Santa has injected a boost into the local economy. Kris realizes Holly is the one for him and gives both girls an extra special Christmas. This is part of the Sexy Secret Santas series of novellas.
"Now," he said, "that flow has dried up."
That's right. Junk galore. But it was beautiful junk. I wanted to bring so much junk home, I just didn't know if it would all fit in the trunk. Oh yeah, I went there. The hubs and I were immature ones repeating the ol' "Junk in the Trunk" joke all day. I am sure we weren't the only ones...
“Two years, next Thursday.”
I may haven’t noticed it but writing greatly helped my communication skills. I must credit this to the people who encouraged me to this and the people supporting to read even if my writing sucks.
Recently focused attention only on a theory of human possibility never entered the nuclear age is more than 6000 years ago.
Ladies and gentlemen, welcome to the ultimate: there is not one element in this poster that was in the same room at the same time. Not only did they feel the need to crop each actors' head on a different body, they went to the extra effort of having their faces airbrushed. You remember Colorforms? I think that's what happened to Jennifer Connelly's hair. And the less said about Winona Ryder's withered right leg, the better.
The response – powerful, dynamic and insatiable – said much about Madrid’s run-in and about their season. As Barcelona’s pursuit gathered pace, much was made of the fact that Madrid had to travel to the Reyno de Navarra, the Calderón, the Camp Nou and San Mamés, home to Osasuna, Atlético, Barcelona and Athletic respectively and theoretically the toughest arenas in Spain. Madrid won all four, scoring 14 times. As if to reinforce the point, they had also won in Seville and Valencia, scoring nine.
Samadhi can be a step toward enlightenment, but it is not essentially so. Staying in these states certainly hastens one’s realization of boundlessness by setting up a clear space between what is you and what is not you. However, one can know and enjoy these states but still not know the essential nature of existence or become liberated from all the compulsive aspects of life.
Some years ago, my mother gave me a bag of vintage handkerchiefs. Some had been mine as a child, some had been hers, and I think some are even older than that. She had kept them in a fabric bag in a dresser drawer all those years. I just don't believe in doing that with heirlooms -- stashing them away so that no one, not even the person who stashed them there, ever sees them or enjoys them. I have always wanted to put these hankies to some good use, and had actually planned to make them into a quilt. I was so determined to do this that I had found a free pattern I wanted to use and had even bought the fabric for the quilt. I had even tried sewing several of the vintage hankies into the center of the quilt blocks. But as much as I wanted to make the quilt, I just couldn't get enthused about the project or get off the ground with it. I don't know if other people ever feel this way about projects, but sometimes I do. It just wasn't looking as nice as I hoped, and, truth be told, was somewhat of a boring project. (Hope my grandchildren never read this, as they are not allowed to use the "B" word.)
My god that man is too good-looking to be real. So how did the Disney Prince fare in Glee‘s warped McKinley universe? Read on after the jump to find out!
First some specific questions about SUMMIT AVENUE
Cottage Holdings may sound a humble affair, but it actually does very big business indeed.
In reality, the most challenging part of restoring this parasol was that it was missing the cap that parasols often (but not always) have at the top of the finial. I sacrificed a slightly expensive (but real metal) pen to make this final cap. I'd like to find a better solution, but for now, this will do.
I had the ads from the turkey day edition ready - folded eight ways to a perfect display of the two items from one store and one item from another. One item's store opens at five, the other at six. We should be able to swing our great grab and be back to the house by seven.
Adds enchantable cloaks of various lore-friendly colours (7 shades so far) to Skyrim, via levelled lists and crafting. This is a work in progress, and I’ll be looking to tweak and improve it in the future. The aim of all this is to add more variety and flavour to the world, as well as the chance to wear a stylish cape and keep the cold out (quite literally keep the cold out! The next update of Chesko’s Frostfall will see these cloaks keeping your character warm! Go check it out)
#18 - At Least He's a Hall of Famer Now
troubling me than religion or people who think problems can be solved with a
Eva Ibbotson’s second-to-the-last novel is as magnificent as any in her vast repertoire. When three individuals with special abilities (and an ordinary boy who insists on accompanying them) receive the task to rescue a princess from an ogre, they reluctantly set out for the distant castle. Upon their arrival, the group discovers that things are definitely not as they have been led to believe. With characteristic Ibbotson humor and charm, this story is a tribute to a master. Nothing more need be said. Perfect for ages 10-12
decisions today ensures a better tomorrow
District Judge Timothy Worman remanded Mouleff in custody to appear at the Old Bailey for a preliminary hearing next Wednesday (December 10).
Paul wrote Romans 8:35, 37 by the inspiration of the Holy Spirit, but he also wrote as he had experienced the working of the Holy Spirit in his life. So he wrote,
Most people of the vaShawasha went to other countries and stayed there until the war was finished. When the war was finished they paid their taxes.
I have been reminded of the many blessings I have been given.
We also normally go on a big road trip, but no such luck this summer, as we are...shall we say low on cash. We've been missing our 'vacation' time, even though we now live in the place in which we always used to vacation.
I can still create things using Scrappin Doodles and KPM Doodles, so you may see an occasional thing from me using their clip art but to be quite honest, it concerns me that I could spend money on more clip art and then the designers can just change their mind and then you have to do whatever they decide.
So, what did I use? Yin and yang, the traditional symbol of balance, of good and evil, light and dark. It fit, it was just too bad that those words had just left my friend's mouth. And yes, I was accused of stealing, and I looked on sheepishly and felt shame, but not so much that I would admit to outright stealing. After all, it's not copyrighted and who would be able to prove that such a daliance took place, a thievery of words and phrases. I sure as hell wouldn't own up to it - I have a rep to manage.
Weight Gain: -10 pounds by my scale.
You know those times when you feel that life just couldn’t possibly be any more perfect? Well in as I have recently learned, in Italy that happens about once a week, and by some supernatural power it just keeps on getting better. Thats not to say living in Italy is perfect. But it’s all the little extra details which can make you forget about the fact that your feet are numb from walking, your roommates are stealing your toilet paper and you can only understand about 10% of what anyone say to you. Everything here is so beautiful and completely soaked in centuries of history and culture. So even when you feel like you can’t take it anymore, or start to wonder why you made the crazy decision to come to this strange place, something amazing always manages to creep out from between the bricks and remind you why you’re here.
then used a staple gun to secure them into place.
3. KELLY. She's a model! Model model model! She's getting new headshots, and spouts a lot of gibberish about modeling and concludes that it is "not easy." BOO HOO.
Anger.
And the fisherman is smiling and singing –
THE CARGO REGISTRATION OFFICER WENT TO THE WESTERN UNION OFFICE TO PICK UP THE MONEY AND THEY TOLD HIM THAT THERE IS NO MONEY THERE.
I’ve done just enough editing myself to know that standing up and saying you’re editing an anthology is a bit like standing up and saying you’re a target—and the larger the scope of the anthology, the larger the target. It’s worse, too, when you’re editing a book that includes living poets: at this point you might as well consider yourself a walking bull's eye, and be prepared to suffer the slings and arrows of outraged poets everywhere. In any anthology, there will be grounds for disagreement: the poor editor has a limited amount of space, and in the end will find that he or she has to select one poet out of dozens with valid claims for inclusion.
2 Tbs warm water
Estimated Price: Vanity/Sink $200-$400 and Toilet $250
cinders fall into the Cedar…
Holocher said, “They emphasize humility, love for the club, love for each other, and a hard work ethic. I think that’s at the core culture of any winning team.”
Nokia Bluetooth Speakers MD-7W
Schools in England are measured on how many pupils get A* to C grades in five GCSEs, including maths and English.
Do you see them—a few high wisps of cirrus, drifting away
Row 2: Join yarn in new color to any ch1 space. Ch3 (1st of 3tr in cl) finish cl (2tr like in description above) in same space, ch2 *mc into next ch1 space ch2*; rep from * to * 7 times, join with sl st into top of beg cl first ch3, fasten off yarn (makes 8 cl/flower petals).
“The Playboy Club” (NBC) Dear NBC, just because you set a show in the 1960′s does not make it “Mad Men”. It’s not even that the show is that bad, it’s just kinda…eh. And when you think about how much dough NBC spent making and marketing it, “eh” is probably not the reaction they were going for. And for the love of God, please lose the Hugh Hefner voice overs…you weren’t changing the hearts and minds of America, Mr. Hefner, you were peddling smut. Classy, well-lit smut, but, smut nonetheless, so, please, get over yourself.
Blind Husbands, like Foolish Wives, is paced for this kind of reflection and analysis more than entertainment, and it can be taxing to watch, despite being relatively short. Von Stroheim directs like a poet composes—focusing maximum attention on a single moment, unpacking and pondering it for as long as is necessary to draw from it every bit of meaning it could impart. I’ve never seen a man nose a woman’s neck for as long as Von Steuben does a waitress’s in one early scene. But because the director lingers on the act, we learn much about Von Steuben’s technique, plus his shamelessness and cruelty toward women desperate for affection. Stick with the film, and you will be rewarded.
Cinnamon – 1 inch stick
After sayin' all of that though, The Champions really starts to show some promise in their very last issue. The Mighty John Byrne had been doin' a few issues and it made a hell of a difference. Unus the untouchable,The Blob and Loreli burst into the Champions tower sayin' that the Sentinels are on their ass for no reason at all,and that this little known super team are their last hope. But naturally the terrible trio at at their work!!!! Brotherhood of Evil Mutants rejects..hmmp!!...cant be trusted! John Byrne's single page panel work is,once again, outstanding and it makes this bit of Bronze Age nostalgia worth a squint! Re-reading the Champions is fun,especially the last half of their run...if only to see Hercules in his old skool calipers!
The flowerpot stationary holder you gave me
like a tertön
calling the sounds of the feet to mind also had the great advantage that it was no longer necessary to attempt to maintain a level of hygiene by washing the fingers one by one in the large mug of tea which was a great relief as it had nearly gone over more than once
Andrew Coulson over at the Cato Institute has an interesting alternative to shoveling money to state-funded schools to save a bloated and corrupt system:
The efficiency is amazing, although many complain about that. I suppose they need to spend a day or two in downtown Johannesburg to realise how majestic the London Underground achievement really is.
Nottingham has a very large teaching hospital called the Queens Medical Centre. Gail works there. Not as a doctor or nurse, but as a receptionist on one of the wards. She enjoys her job, organising the patients files, liaising with doctors, porters and ambulance staff and all the other tasks that admin staff undertake besides answering the telephone. There is a bit of patient contact too, which Gail loves to do, as she is such a caring and thoughtful person.
It's all gone scary as we suddenly get a weird lingering close-up of a woman's face.
Barbara, you’ve been to the other side and can recall your previous lives. What have you learned from those experiences? How have they informed the book?
"and every spirit that does not confess Jesus is not from God. This is the spirit of the antichrist, which you heard was coming and now is in the world already." ~1 John 4:3
04. Dazed And Confused
3.What can your fans look forward to next?
I believe this data gap from the Web Bot is predicting the next geomagnetic storm that will be much larger then the one in 1859. If this is true, then it is time to start preparing yourself on how to live in a world without electricity. Once the grid gets blown, how long do you think it would take to get a whole country back on line? I just happened to be living in Hawaii during the earthquake of 2006. Some people were without power for a week. Now think about the fact that this was only one power grid. If the world went down, what do you think. Not day's, not months, but years.
By the way, I think my photos weren’t up to standard this time because I didn’t bring any lighting equipment with me. So if you want to see some really beautiful shots of this stuff, take a look at what Spanish Hipster , Craig’s Grape Adventure and Alice Gao at Lingered Upon did.
He threw back his head to say no. “What was difficult for me was to leave Malatya. That’s where my roots are. I’ve never felt at home in Istanbul.”
A is wearing a disguise
“I never even heard of them. I didn’t know Brooklyn had a baseball field,” said Garesha Ferguson, a 10th grader at Cobble Hill School of American Studies.
Divide batter between both prepared pans and bake for 30/40 minutes, test for doneness with a cake tester. I baked mined for 40 minutes. Serve with berries or dusted with confectioners sugar.
Grange Furniture is one of my favorite lines. I spent a lovely evening at a swank party in their Paris shop a couple of years ago and they do know how to throw a fete. Their modern updates of classic French styles are always winners.
In the USA, The Glenrothes is marketed by Campari America, the new name for Skyy Spirits, which in addition to Skyy Vodka also gives us Wild Turkey bourbon and rye.
------- Levine does not see the Red Sox getting a significant player in return for Theo Epstein.
in your own time
During the course of some recent research I had an opportunity to peruse the ex-parte injunctions granted to Microsoft in the 32 law-suits that it has filed in the year 2011. While several of the ex-parte orders were unavailable on the High Court website, all of the remaining orders that were available were passed by the Hon’ble Justice Gita Mittal, who is the senior most judge on the original side of the Delhi High Court. It thus appears that the Delhi High Court is assigning all Microsoft matters to only one judge. The first benefit of this practice is that it ensures consistency in all orders and the second benefit lies in the fact that this allows judges themselves to develop an expertise in that particular area of law. It is very interesting to note that Justice Mittal has developed a standard form for all ex-parte orders in Microsoft cases (A sample is available over here) in order to ensure consistency. The ‘standard form’ seems to be based on the earlier experiences of the High Court in dealing with such cases. All her orders are identical with only the names of the defendants being altered. Most importantly the ‘standard form’ itself is remarkably nuanced and very protective of the defendant’s rights.
Amazingly, results are fairly immediate for such a large project. Here’s the brief story I received via email just 24 hours later about my FITE-sponsored businesswoman:
Sources close to the DOP&T informed that the issue of granting one increment to the government servants, whose increment date falls between February 2006 and June 2006, has been forwarded to Finance Ministry for its approval. According to the sources, the Finance Ministry gave its approval to this proposal as agreed by the Government in the National Anomaly Committee.
I found the following written on the 14th November, the birthday of Prince Charles and also our eldest daughter:-
This is the same principle used in spas to reduce the appearance of cellulite. But you can do this in the comfort - and privacy - of your own home. HotPants are most effective when used while exercising and working out, but can be worn any time, while doing housework or running errands, or even while sleeping.
Once golden and pale the blue of her gown
“One thing that is special about Iceland,” explains Sólrún, “is that we are a small community, and as we live on an island we have to work with each other to get along. There is a lot of co-working with bands going on, so there is this good community – not really a sense of competition but more of assistance. Also, the popular music scene has bonds with the island’s classical musicians, because we all grew up together, went to the same music schools. Sometimes we might work with people from the symphony orchestra or with a heavy metal band. So there are a lot of cross-connections.”
'Never judge a book by its cover' is how the saying goes, but when I saw that gorgeous Joey HiFi cover for Chuck Wendig's Blackbirds I knew I had to own that book, if only for the cover. I know, how shallow, but that's how I roll in the case of Joey's Angry Robot covers; I also own two editions of Lauren Beukes' Moxyland, the old one, which I read, and the new Joey HiFi-covered edition, which was published this year. So this was a book that was sold by its cover. Once I'd read the synopsis for Blackbirds though, I really got excited to read the bookas well, as the idea for the book intrigued me. A psychic who can only foretell people's deaths? That's got to be an interesting starting point for a story! And it was, interesting that is. A good read too, though I did have some reservations while reading.
To begin this project, I went to Walmart and got a “tube” of 5 pounds of ground beef. We don’t have the freezer space to get 50 pounds at once so this will have to be done in increments.
“I refuse to go there. What else did you have an urge for today?”
Shaken: Combine all the ingredients in a cocktail shaker. Shake well and pour into a tall glass with ice cubes
I know of only one Trotskyist (who could, by now, be an ex-Trot) who worked as a sub-editor on The Herald Sun in the 1980s. I don’t know if he’s still there or working elsewhere in the industry. I am not going to name him just in case.
I recently received a comment on the blog from Steve (also a draft judge) inquiring about distance from the rear legs of the dog to the cart. He wrote that the guidelines online are vague about the distance so I wrote back to Steve. Unfortunately, I wrote back to the wrong Steve. Steve, if you're out there, this blog post is for you.
Something Old
"HA... no way, I just finished mowing my grass & am gross" I argued
This is an all night sipping beer or what I'll call a destination beer. This is something you can pull out of the refrigerator at 8, pour yourself a half glass, pop in a Netflix and drink while you munch on some cheese popcorn and keep the bottle on the counter and go back for more until it's gone. If you're more worldly than me you can pop it open, cut up some aged cheeses, crack open a book and keep going back for more until it's gone. I would recommend that you drink a bottle with a buddy because of it's 11% ABV. The ABV is presumably to blame for Chimpotle uttering the nonsensical line "this is the chili dog of the Double Wide" in reference to another beer about 10 minutes after we finished off the bottle of Rye on Rye. For the $12 it retails for it should be seen as a destination, the kind of beer you pop open for a night when you want to give your taste buds a workout and you don't mind getting a little drunk for that workout. Rye on Rye will be available at KC liquor stores on Monday the 22nd.
Unable to access twitter & facebook has been the worst part of the imposed internet silence. I realise that I get most of my news from twitter, from trusted 'sources' whose links I follow - and although I could occasionally access twitter on my 'phone I could not open the links - bah humbug! Facebook silence has meant I could not follow the progress of a poorly relative plus I have been down on both my home gossip and - along with the loss of twitter - my political campaigning!
3.) Bad guys. Chick Hick in the first CARS was bad enough. But you added a whole posse of bad guys. Brilliant. Preschoolers and little grade schoolers love that good guys vs. bad guys bit. It was a perfect idea. But you know where it all went wrong? Horribly.... Awfully...... WRONG?
Oct 03 2008 Seattle, WA @ King Cobra
“The Panthers are one of my favorite teams to deal with. I really like working with Marty. I’ll go through it with him,” Rosenhaus said. “I don’t know how aggressive they’re going to be going forward in free agency. But I’ve got a few guys I want to talk to him about.”
Ah, goodbye lovely, comfy hotel – its off to Scotland we went. We decided to travel by British Rail. The trip up was quite good. I have a photo of me at Kings Cross Station, entering Platform ¾ – yay, Hogwarts!!! We, unfortunately, learnt that had we brought our tickets straight from Kings Cross Station rather than from the Internet in advance, the cost would have been more than half. It is a very, very painful lesson. Kings Cross to Euston is a one stop trip on the Tube. Lots and lots and lots and lots of escalators. From Euston, even if you have two hours until your train, check. We were directed to a train immediately as the next was 2 hours in the future. It was a long trip of about five hours but really, who cares as you get to watch Britain roll past the windows. Lots of tiny twin lambs, rolling green hills, villages with identical houses. We asked about this and apparently people like to have the same looking house and frontage as their neighbours. Strange hey?
1 tsp turmeric powder
Bennett: “You mean Grandpa?”
and in a mystery to be
The beetle is known as the common soldier beetle Rhagonycha fulva and is only seen in it’s adult form at this time of year.
next week? i'm calling a cleaning service to come clean this house from top to bottom. germs begone!
I have always wanted to try my hand at decorating a cake with fondant. In fact, a few years ago, I bought some ready-made from the cake decorating isle and planned to use it for my daughter's birthday cake. I went online for some ideas and tips, then I started reading about the taste of this store-bought fondant. That worried me. I went to the kitchen, tore open the package, and pinched off a bit and tasted it. YUCK! It had a fake chemical taste to it. I was NOT going to use that on my daughter's cake. I threw it in the garbage and made a traditional butter cream frosting instead. I put my fondant aspirations on hold.
Exactly. And it isn’t just the Romans, the SS used to do that too. It’s how totalitarians act. And it’s why we’ve been calling the EPA an out-of-control agency that needs to be abolished. We have the examples of the Sacketts who were going to build their dream home with a view of the lake— and the EPA descended on them calling their suburban lot a “wetland” and fining them $75,000 a day until they had returned their graded lot to its natural state, and $37.500 a day for violating the law, and another $37,500 for something or other. The Supreme Court put an end to that.
Moon felt a nip on his leg and glanced back....there was blood! The Mod whippet looked up at Stella who was been dragged by a lead and away from the beach.
Transfer nut mixture to a 9" springform pan and gently press to form a crust on bottom of pan.
Memorable Line: “Oh, shit.”
Mitt Romney has a great asset in his wife, Ann. It was foolish in the extreme to attack her… not only a dedicated housewife and mother of five children, but a cancer survivor and a victim of MS, as well. Her husband is a self-made man whose personal accomplishments absolutely eclipse anything done by our president, whose greatest claim to fame is being a ‘guest lecturer’ and community rabble-rouser.
Americans know you can't do it all but they still try to do too much and they beat themselves up when they're not the best at every single thing. I think this is a pursuit to "be the best you can be" which at first seems like a great thing to try to achieve, but as I have explained here, it can be too much since even one formal group activity has changed to be excessive and with a wider breadth than focusing just on the activity.
Tamariand: small golf size ball soaked in 2 cup warm water
Austurstræti 18, 101 Reykjavík
Classmate Ogata asks Urabe out one day, and Urabe makes him wait a day for her decision, which irks Tsubaki. The next day, Urabe goes commando, making her saliva especially intense. It has no effect on Ogata, and she rejects him. When performing the same test on Tsubaki, his nose bleeds on cue, proving the strength of their emotional connection.
The unannounced trip recalled President George W. Bush’s Thanksgiving 2003 trip to Iraq, a cloak-and-dagger operation that saw him sneak off his Texas ranch, fly to Washington and then on to Baghdad with a small group of aides and reporters. Obama’s visit also comes on the ninth anniversary of Bush’s “Mission Accomplished” speech about the Iraq war, a cautionary tale for any president tempted to take a “victory lap” in wartime.
Of course, the name Making All Things New really has to do with my faith. My faith and I are really inseparable and I want others to know a little of the reasoning behind that. So, here's the new description of my shop and explanation of my name as found in my Etsy profile:
First of all, as referenced above, three times Matthew says “on the third day” when describing the time of Jesus’ resurrection (i.e. Matt 16:21; 17:23; 20:19). Obviously, Matthew is not trying to contradict himself.
I'm about at my breaking point with all that is going on around me. Even though this is an uncomfortable--and completely bewildering--place to be, I know this is where I need to be.
Soon the Economic Bailout Explosive wasn’t enough, the leaders needed to use Quantitative Easing Explosive. This was a magical explosive, which made people’s money decrease in value without even touching it.As the cylinder's flight arc grew shorter, the self-congratulations grew more strained.
8/13/1:30am – pitched starter at about 75˚ with a temp corrected OG of 1.077. I put the BB in a tub of cold water and by 2:20am the temp was down to 70˚. I want the fermentation to start out low then I'll take it out and let it rise naturally.
So if you need a whole mess of Flesh Hounds or Fiends of Slaanesh (and who doesn't, really), go check it out! Plus you could always get some plastic Seekers if you're more of a light rock kind of person.
Someone remind me of this next week.
In January 2009, the head of domestic security service MI5 revealed that 2,000 people in Britain were involved with Islamist terrorist plots and many more support terrorism through fundraising and propaganda.
06 Alright
Farewell, thou child of my right hand, and joy;
Dear Lord,
"My character will be less tolerant than a lot of those who have gone before him," he said.
Reading Group – text yet to be decided
I think it would be wrong if all the funds of the Australia Council went to just a few companies. That would really be setting up a kind of state monopoly.
Hijablicious will be working in collaboration with Olga on the project, in particular to advise on the detail of the Hijab particularly from a Muslim perspective as well as styling the shoot, casting models and working on set to ensure the depiction of the women is as accurate as possible. I will also be working with Olga to conduct research for the type of Hijab we will be using and sourcing garments and clothing to represent a variety of religions and cultures.
Michelle Lovric is a very versatile writer of novels for adults and children. She has particular interests in art, the history of medicine and Venice, where she lives part of the time and where all her novels are at least partially set. Her most recent novel for adults, The Book of Human Skin, featured on the 2011 TV Book Club. Talina in the Tower is her third novel for children, and she’s currently at work on her fourth, The Fate-in-the-Box. She is currently a Royal Literary Fund Fellow at the Courtauld Institute of Art. For more information, see her website: www.michellelovric.com
9. Biscuits
Her previous books were cute, strange but had a lightness to them. In this she is going into a darkerside and I am not sure that I am a fan.
I don't know what is wrong... but the answer will come...
Veteran journalist Marites Dañguilan Vitug revealed that Chief Justice Renato Corona’s wife Cristina once held five positions all at the same time at Camp John Hay in 2007: chairperson, president, chief executive officer, chief operating officer and board member. Mrs. Corona declined to react to the report while her four other personalities were unavailable for comment.
The Olympics is such a wonderful event. It starts with a bit of pomp and lots of pageantry and maybe just a touch of patriotism with the opening ceremonies. Smiling athletes, wave flags and march through the arena filled with high spirits and higher hopes. Throughout the games we will learn about different sports and the dedicated athletes that play them. For two and a half weeks we will be held spellbound by the world’s best of the best. We will be captivated by the both the games and the players, awestruck by breathtaking displays of athletic prowess and achievement.
At-Large Bid: Big XII Conference
Giveaway ends Thursday, September 15th at 9:00 a.m. EST. Open to international entries. Winner will be chosen via random.org and will be emailed a code for a free download of the MyMemories Suite v2.
I’m worried right now that what God wants for me or that God’s plan for me is not my plan. What if this time I don’t get what I want? What if this time, his faithfulness is a no?
5.Coriander Leaves : a handful
As a craft beer drinker, it is empowering to know that there are Certified Beer Judges and Certified Cicerone™'s out there making sure that beer is being made well, beer is being stored well, poured properly, and that I will receive the best possible beer when I go out. As a craft brewer it gives me confidence that my beer will be poured in clean lines and clean glassware at proper temperatures so that people can enjoy it how I intend it to be.
It’s New Year’s Day in New York City. I’ve spent a quiet day recuperating from the way-more-than-enough great fun I had the night before, and it’s time I get out for some of Brooklyn’s fresh air, and it’s time I have something to eat, and I know the corner grocer is open 24/7/365, so . . .
Thanks Jennifer for commissioning me to celebrate your anniversary. (I seem to be very popular with anniversaries.) Go buy that pink Harley and let's the three of us go for a ride.
“All of us at the ICRC and at the British Red Cross share the grief and outrage of Khalil’s family and friends. We are devastated,” said ICRC Director-General Yves Daccord. “Khalil was a trusted and very experienced Red Cross staff member who significantly contributed to the humanitarian cause.”
There were very important events coming up: Our younger daughter was graduating from high school in May, our elder daughter was to be married (at Disneyworld) in June with a reception at our farm in Tennessee to follow 10 days later, and Becky’s dish convention was coming up in July. And, at least for the wedding, there were some details still to be worked out. During the spring, her doctors at Vanderbilt recommended that she start treatments with a low dose of a drug she had tried before, which she did. A higher dose was not recommended this soon after transplant. And although this drug had not been effective earlier, her new immune system after transplant offered a very different host environment where it might be effective this time around. Also, it causes relatively few side effects and would not likely interfere with the upcoming happy events.
Man.. It's gettin' warm outside again.. finally...the sun is out longer and I'm seein' beautiful women walkin around everywhere in less clothing.. YUP..it's almost Summer time again and guess what, we need somethin that slap in the trunk.. this new one from Jay Rock is precisely that..
DUMP IN ALL AT ONCE THE FLOUR AND USING A WOODEN SPOON
Why do we feel the need to ‘manage and control’ everything. In nature these two terms are meaningless. In nature, process and behaviours are attracted around naturally occurring patterns. So why don’t we learn from this and work with nature not against it. Storytelling, stories and communities all co-evolved thousands of years ago together with the necessary neurological, cognitive and social processes.
So after breakfast, we all piled into hubby's car (because my Mama Mobile tire was getting flat, ugh!) and I asked Nana to put a blindfold on. So she did. And we teased her the entire ten minute drive to the surprise. We told her people were staring at us and someone was calling the police on their cell because I had abducted her. She was mortified, but Kerri laughed and giggled the entire ten minutes. I warned Kerri not to give the surprise away, and told her not to say a word.
Some of the ingredients are different then what I usually use in my bentos - but that just means that the seasons are changing and they will be full of lots more of fresh and in season fruits and veggies! ^^
Wow. Can you imagine? This man did not only know the location of Kissena Blvd, but apparently, he was able to give specific directions to a particular address based on its street number alone! This seemed to be an incredible feat to me at the time, like some brilliant memory act using mnemonic devices. Or perhaps he was a savant with special abilities to know everything about street addresses.
If you go to a practica, it's presumably to get better. Ask the people who you like to dance with what they would change in your dancing. You don't have to change, but you should know what people thing you need to change.
In northern Kenya, health authorities have warned about a cholera outbreak because most of the areas affected by floods lack clean drinking water, Kenya’s Daily Nation reported.
2x Contagion Clasp
Today i plan on relaxing and taking it easy.So hope everyone have a great weekend...........take care.........
That shook, when he laughed like a bowlful of jelly.
How/Why are we processing these Trans Fats? We really did mean well, as one of the big issues with unsaturated fats is the concern about storage due to rancidification. Therefore to solve this problem and increase shelf life, people went about hydrogenating
Things were a little different back then. We didn’t have a mobile phone to our name, and getting online was still a matter of a clunky dial-up connection, then counting the minutes for fear of running up a monster bill.
Amazingly, the iconic Cantina Band was never realized in action-figure form in the original Kenner line-up, but you could purchase a painted representation of them as part of the Creature Cantina playset.
But one thing is for certain. Pessimism is growing stronger by the day.
Row 16- sc in each sc and ch around. (60)
I have to admit that I first recognize her because her face is somehow similar with Song Hye Kyo, but later on I don’t remember about it as much. Hyoyeon is also Nhung’s favorite SNSD member.
Bingo! I found George's death certificate and that of his wife, Hattie. The information from the certificates added a few pieces of information to my research. I found it sad that when George's widow, Hattie, provided the information on George's death certificate, she didn't know the name of her mother-in-law. Why so sad? Because his mother, Eliza Ann Olmstead Laymon, had lived with the couple in the 1930s, as per the 1930 U.S. Census records.
I am having a serious issue.
a. Finished
it is nearing late night as i write this. i’m here at ———- the old irish pub that is wedged in between a parking garage and and a small insurance office. i’m sitting here in the ‘dart room,’ and there is nothing but a thin curtain that is separating me from a restaurant full of happy families, younger business men, and random patrons singing the drunkest irish songs i have ever heard.
Catch Me Daddy by Big Brother & The Holding Company
Nothing is more peaceful than laying on the ground looking up into the clouds. I know heaven really isn’t in the clouds but I like to imagine that the angels are sitting on them looking down on me keeping me safe.
Let the curry boil to a consistency you like. I like it thick.This curry will thicken as it cools. You will see a thin layer of oil floating on top, which comes from the coconut that was used.I would say, that's the way a perfect Theeyal would look like :-)
Fareda: Oh look. Professor Rashib left his folder.
More perversely, the threat of financial sanctions now guards the immunity afforded to Saleh's family by the GCC and UN. The White House hopes to scrub away at least some of this mess before May 22nd's "Friends of Yemen" conference in Riyadh, where Saleh signed the GCC's deal in October 2011, yet Obama inadvertently exposes his administration's hypocrisy by indirectly targeting Saleh as a "national security threat." With full knowledge of his duplicitous personality, the White House and Pentagon accelerated its support for Saleh's regime prior to Yemen's revolution and has yet to let go completely.
Jerome
“ Take a feather pillow- cut it open and let the feathers scatter in the wind. Wait a day and then go and gather up all those feathers”
Daphanie Droop is a student at St. Bartholomew's Catholic School in Cloverdale. She is the eldest daughter of Eldon and Espa Droop of 253 Maple Lane, a quaint little cottage at the end of the lane surrounded with a pink picket fence and two large willow trees.
Thank you so much to everyone who joined us for our last challenge which was set by Lisa, so many wonderful projects incorporating wings.
The Council’s Cabinet will decide the future of council housing in March 2010. There are two ways in which Sheffield’s council housing could be managed: one is continued managed by an Arms Length Management Organisation; the other one is directly managed by the City Council.
Unwanted graffiti was a large part of the visual blight that dominated most vistas in the borough. As everyone knows, however, tools can be used for good or bad, and when seen in this light, it is perhaps not so ironic that the aerosol spray demonstrates quite clearly that in times of need, your worst enemy can become Your Best Friend :)
Tied in with physical visibility is the virtual visibility provided by the internet. The platform that concerns most of us is our blog. Once you have a blog established it is important to infuse quality content into it, especially if you are intending it to be a professional showcase of who you are and the abilities you possess. A blog can be a great marketing tool as much as it can be the stage for a fool. Hopefully you are not putting yourself in the latter category unless buffoonery is the persona you are trying to sell.
Many of our famous beaches are gone. Vistas that once were are now spoilt by concrete condos that block the sun and the sea from view. Smelly yellow-green effluent from unknown sources trickles onto sands at Bathsheba and other formerly-pristine areas.
How can this system be considered one-man-one-vote? And the system of first-past-the-post makes it worse. It is seats and not votes that determines the winner. You can form the government with only 40% of the votes, or less. Did not Hitler become Germany’s leader this way, with less than 40% of the votes? And did this not result in tens of millions of deaths when Hitler took the world through another World War?
Mr. Okah says the President and his aides organized the attacks in a desperate political strategy to demonize political opponents, and win popular sympathy ahead of the 2011 elections
Today, we took a taxi to the Safari Park. Taxis are cheap here too. It was about a 40 minute ride and cost $6. We were so thankful to be able to rent a stroller-- actually, when I saw them, I said, "Thank you, Lord!!" out loud. :) First, we went on the "Safari on Wheels." It's similar to the safari at Disney's Animal Kingdom but maybe even better. My hubby loves to read maps and plan out the best routes but the park's map was confusing--even if it would have been in English! We did see everything we wanted to see though. Brielle seemed to enjoy it too. We were told it might be difficult to get a taxi for the way back since we weren't inside the city at this point. We walked and walked to get back out to the main entrance gate...and right then, a taxi was dropping people off at the zoo and we were able to hop right in. I love how God takes care of us!
“Aren’t you going to…”
Suki Suki Mai-san – Audio Made Visual So I was listening to the OVA drama CD Suki Suki Mai-san while reading the English script made by Ichigo Aji-Yuri Tendou. I found the story enjoyable but was having trouble keeping track with the lines since I don’t understand Japanese. I was trying to to think of a way to make this drama CD more friendly to non-Japanese speakers and ended up with something in the style of the Reo x Mai Diaries: Encode … Read More
Growing up in San Diego, I visited SF a few times as a kid, but it wasn’t until I was in college, in Santa Cruz, that I first felt seduced. I had come up in the summer of 2002 to do an internship at Bill Graham Presents. It was the summer between my junior and senior year, and my friend Mani and I were sharing a room (a converted living room with no actual door) in a building at the corner of Haight and Central. We were both freshly 21, with very little money, a whole lotta heart, and a willingness to give ourselves to the City so she could do with us what she wanted. And she certainly did.
Laurent Koscielny joined Arsenal from FC Lorient for £8.25m. With the absence of Thomas Vermaelen, he and Johan Djourou have forged a very strong understanding and have worked very hard in the heart of our defense. They even have a catchy nickname called Djourcielny. He was born on the 10th of September, 1985 in a French town called Tulle. The way his career has turned around is a massive fairytale. 4 years ago, he was plying his trade in Tours FC, a Ligue 2 outfit. In his next season with the club he missed only 4 league games and scored 5 goals in the process. This earned him a place in the French Ligue 2 Team of the Year. FC Lorient snatched him up for €1.7m. He was also ever-present in the club that has a fish with a ball as its logo and missed only 3 league games.
I wanna be relaxing with a music magazine and a cup of fancy tasting tea,
In 1979, The Muppets and singer-songwriter John Denver performed "The Twelve Days of Christmas" together on the 1979 television special John Denver and the Muppets: A Christmas Together.
I have been working hard to get ready for Market. I finally bought my plane tickets and found a hotel. I hate doing that stuff because it takes so much time and is so BORING. So I procrastinate. Getting the booth ready is much more fun, so I will start on that in the next few days. At least I will think about it. That way I kind of have an idea in my head about where it is going when I get there.
The Mitsui petrochemical plant has been rocked by a second explosion as the plant owner is now claiming the radioactive agents are harmless to people.
“Well, that’s the last straw,” says the wife. “I’ve had enough, I want a divorce.”
I’m a nerd for anything with strong characters and story — A Chuck Jones cartoon, any Roald Dahl story, NPR’s This American Life, Mad magazine, Ollie & Moon. In fact, I still bug my Mom to tell me a story now and again.
With the inquests due to be heard in sequence, Mr Leckey planned to deal with the issue of PII and subsequent disclosure to the court on a rolling basis, with only material relating to each incident being processed before that specific case. But in the last few days, with Mr Leckey at the stage where he could hear the first PII application, the coroner received a letter from the police indicating they now had a “fundamental difficulty” with the PII issue.
Anyway, I am happy to announce that I am back to blogosphere finally! Stay tuned! =)
So this is kid of what it will look like in pictures:
Alcohol by volume: 5.2%
When we are in a relationship, I hope that each of us realizes that we are connected with someone who is also trying their best to be perfect. Encourage each other, find the good in each other, and shout for joy when your partner achieves what they are trying to do.
Most problems aren’t too bad if they come one at a time. It’s when they seem to be coming from all sides that things can get overwhelming.
So I ended up turning my runny frosting into a fresh strawberry Japanese-style cheesecake. I used this recipe - It requires one-fourth of the cream cheese required in NY-style cheesecake, and the batter is lightened with whipped egg whites. After I baked it in a water bath and then let it cool, I couldn't wait - I had to try it. The cake turned out light, fluffy, and lived up to its nickname of "cotton cake". I usually see this cake decorated with fresh fruit and glaze, but I actually thought it tasted great just plain. The next time I make it, hopefully I'll have the will power to refrain from cutting into it before it's decorated!
3. Roll the pastry over the rolling pin then unroll the pastry onto the dish.
Thanks Angela, Linda, and Lisa, for your willingness to think outside the box – just like Jesus did.
11:00 a.m.: The coup leaders (referring to themselves as the CNRDR) make another announcement on TV. The camera shows 15-20 young people in fatigues gathered around spokesman Lieutenant Amadou Konaré. He begins to read a prepared text but his microphone isn’t working, and it takes the crew several minutes to fix the problem before he can start over again. He calls on all his fellow soldiers to rally to the CNRDR, and to stop firing into the air (an act he describes as “an expression of joy”). He says that all Mali’s borders have been closed, and he invites government staff to return to work on Tuesday, March 27. (Monday the 26 is a holiday, so the only “extra” days off are today and tomorrow.)
Believe me when I tell you that I am totally flabbergasted over on this side of the screen, here.
And what is it you ask?
That leaves four hours to decontaminate the hovel. And bake a Battenberg. Or maybe not. Last time they came Sophie's Bodened baby found a long, black hair in her fairy cake. It wasn't the fairy's. Dear old Archie Bubbles Bum-Bum, my aged Jack Russell x Black Lab - someone lent his dad an orange crate - sheds enough hair to knit a sweater from. I might do that and sell it on Esty.
Most all have gone to the gathering game
While these apps pre-loaded with bunches of well-crafted memes are wonderful and all, like anything great, originality is always the key. If you feel you can up the stakes on what’s already out there, why not try your hand at creating your own meme?
968 **D-V/6/1987. “A Constitutional Primer for Executives.” Federal Executives Board, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(2), above, pp. 1109-12.)
The art was on a whole different level, at least in the second half of the series. I can’t find the words to describe, so I’ll stick to ‘amazing’. In the beginning of the series, Seo Kouji’s art style was pretty average. But later on, it became a lot . . . prettier. The characters seem more mature, like high schoolers, instead of elementary school students. I suspect Seo Kouji did this on purpose to show the change in the characters as they grew physically and in age. (I also noticed that Yamato’s hair became more and more flat, instead of spiky and messy.)
Then I read a blog post about an artist who only worked in black and white watercolor. Try as I might, I have not been able to locate that post or artist through googling but he rendered incredible scenes using black and white watercolor. They were mostly night scenes, many of which were of highways and cities. I forgot about this artist until Eva posted a watercolor in black, here. Thank-you, Eva. You sent me on a journey that has been very rewarding and informative for me.
As a final note on these notes, please do not print out these sample images and try to pass them off as real. Counterfeiting is sort of an issue here.
We dropped LooHoo off at The Boss’s house so she could babysit for a couple of hours and then headed home for Doodle and me to change clothes and head back out to see Disney on Ice at the Target Center! It was pretty incredible, and, as always, it was great fun to hang out with Doodle.
In production start the job 15 mins after the server starts and run the job every 20 mins, using 8 parallel threads. The nodes to work against are specified in the node
Summary of the IP
The Women’s Rio+20 Good Practice Award
I need your help. We have a sick kiddo that really could use some "card love".
Boil the potatoes in salted water until tender.
My son, let me rock You
2. Don’t Stop Believin…Best advice every given..if you have the strength to believe it’s true.
Session 5
At first it sucked horribly. I hate running. I am terrible at it. But damn if don’t feel great afterwards. He gave me something to control in my crazy life. My new PT schedule was getting noticed and leadership started to lay off me. I had a blood transfusion and I started getting faster. It was actually nice to think you can do better, know you can do better, and then do your best. It was painful but at the end of the day you know you did something.
Pretty neat, huh? This brings up the question: how do you like to edit? I edit in 3 stages:
One of the most successful programmes that have been identified by the Ministry is the Homestay programme which surpassed its target of 23% of occupancy rate and achieved a rate of 32%.
Context on the show: Homer finagles his way onto the jury of Springfield’s first ever film festival. The two chief contenders for the top prize, at least according to Homer? An Orson Welles-esque black and white masterpiece by town drunk Barney and a ten second clip of an old man getting hit in the groin by a football.
And give up. With him
Setlist (Will Fit On 1 Disc):
At certain times, however, it has awoken. Why is unknown. At times of crisis it seems more likely to do so, but whether they wake it or it causes them is unclear. And occasionally, it has arisen in times of peace. But two constants do remain in its awakenings - the first is that it always has a message for someone, usually of great importance for some reason or another. Which, unfortunately for their recipients, are almost never clear; once it told an ambassaor to be sure to put out his fire before journeying. Which he did, sweeping the ashes well into a fireplace, and making sure they were quite cold. However, a lantern that he didn't extinguish burned down half of the forest the elves live in when he knocked it over while he slept.
I'm actually looking forward to going offshore for the mere fact that I will not drink alcohol and will manage to have some balanced meals. Normally I eat pretty well with the weight watchers and all, but I don't even think I had so much as a celery stick since the wife left. I managed to squeeze in a couple 7 mile runs, but I don't know if that going to do much.
Time to stop writing now. I’m off to The Princess of Wales pub for a Spiritual London meet up. It’s my first time to go,but no doubt I’ll enjoy myself and meet some new peeps. And have a tasty brew as well! Enjoy your life!
Of course, creating the network that would underpin these smart devices and cities would be a monumental undertaking, but — perhaps unsurprisingly — companies like IBM and Cisco are already working on such systems.
See below election day pictures across the United Kingdom.
Shag looked hurt.
Brodsky asked about the first $2 billion. Lieber said that’s where the city was with Hudson Yards.
ALL TYPES OF “INFINITY” DEVICES
We don't seek any glory
THANK YOU so much for stopping by and I hope that I've inspired you to use your stamps for something other than cards. Next up, hop on over to Amy's blog.
Carrie Fundingsland of HousePlay Inc. is a recent recipient of House Beautiful Magazine's list of the next 20 designers to watch, her portfolio is filled with warm, lively, and beautiful spaces that have been admired by clients, celebrities and critics alike. She also maintains an online store called “House and Wear” and is launching a new line of eco-friendly fabrics in late 2010, drawing inspiration from nature and her cultural influences from being raised on a reservation in her hometown of Montana.
“Los Cuernos Del Paine” – Patagonia, Chile – Ian Plant – Featured Photographer
What Bucket List?
And lurking behind all of this is a constant menace, the dark we hide from, the monsters we know are under the bed. Skillfully, the dread increases, the anxiety ramps ups a notch after notch much like the music from the shower scene in Alfred Hitchcock’s Psycho. We know where the danger coming from in both eras but not how or when it will strike. And strike it does in stomach churning, heart stopping ways. Mystically, brutally rendered evil to balance the joy and love that infuses the rest of the story.
While I was training at the gym, one of the young women mentioned she would like to have a midwife. I told her I’d considered midwifery, and she asked if I could complete the course in seven months. Of course the answer was no, but it did get me thinking about following up on something I’d learned about only a short time earlier – becoming a labour doula. I signed up for CAPPA Canada’s online course and got to work.
If you look in your social media streams you will see someone sharing a leadership quote or recommending a leadership book. In fact, that is what I am doing right now. I am using my blog to discuss the topic of leadership with you. I also post a daily sucess quote on my Facebook status each day.
Nowadays this urge is not so strong. I have reached some kind of equilibrium—unconscious, mostly—with these external forms. Always aware of them, always knowing on the edges of my consciousness that they’re there, the mountains and the forests hold me like primeval mothers’ arms. Knowing this, I spend more time indoors, exploring the inner wilderness of line, form, and color.
As a side note, let me add that Mori wasn't the only Variety reviewer to do this sort of thing. It's our good luck now that the Spoiler Police weren't so powerful back then; the detailed descriptions in Variety's reviews from 1907 to 1930 are virtually all we have to go on for movies now lost beyond recall. I've found them invaluable in researching the careers of the stars in the M.J. Moriarty deck of movie playing cards.
But City Council member Lew Fidler feels that DBP salaries are too high, with several members getting fairly high six-figure salaries, including President Joe Chan, who makes $220,000.
Cook the meat for 45 minutes to one hour. When it is done remove the meat from the pot and add the 1 tsp of cornstarch dissolved in 1 tsp of water. Boil until the sauce is thickened. Add the saffron and simmer for couple of minutes. Serve by garnishing with the pomegranate seeds. I served it over rice.
Now, if the rest of you already knew this, then I'll just resign myself to being the slowest person on the planet and hang up this whole blogging job.
It’s gonna be a busy weekend.
(all of the rest are taken by RobbCyr Photography.com. and BBBBTTTTWWWW if you live in CT and are in need of a wedding/baby/anything photographer Robb Cyr is your man. He'll also give you a discount if you tell him I sent ya!)
Here are the bags from what I bought:
14. The Bird and the Bee - Private Eyes
Damian moved away from his brother and busied himself with whittling away at a stick. That whole business with his sister aside, he was still thinking over what Keith had said to him earlier in the morning about how to treat girls.
Original Blues Classics OBC 537,1992. (re-issue of 1963 release)
Taking things harder then they should be handled
Most of you know I'm a big proponent of the Law of Attraction, which says that whatever you're putting out into the Universe, you're attracting back to you—the good and the bad. So far, no sign of a silver-tipped Brad Pitt but, hey, maybe I'm too askeered of Angie to allow him to enter my space. (Or am I? . . . Come to me, Brad.)
Jeremy M. Carrington, 34, New York, N.Y.
So the Averys has to catch up with the Jeffersons. They tear in and out of the driveway, as if they have just filled a book of Green Stamps.
Fresh mint leaves, torn 1/4 cup
I styled it as a bar for them, included the citrine leather album for their portfolio, and a guest book.
Happy St. Paddy's everyone- and be safe!
the scene and reportedly became
Walsh picks up the Tex-Mex story in The Tex-Mex Grill and Backyard Barbacoa Cookbook (2010) that focuses on grilling and smoking techniques you’ll find in restaurants, backyards, and various ho-downs in the Lone Star state. Yeah, there’s some repeated material from the earlier book (There’s Martinez and his frozen margaritas again).
All right, so their campaign was a spectacular failure, and Domenech might only have picked him after consulting Mèg Mystique. Diaby was still one of only a couple of players to leave South Africa with dignity intact. Because by this time he had also developed a better sense of what was happening around him.
Not because I was half naked in a public place, because honestly, who hasn't been there, but because I was totally being a copy cat dirty rat.
You're cold and out of firewood, and she doesn't care. You're lonely and far from friends, she laughs. You struggle in your daily life and party to forget your troubles, while she just goes on dishing out her own dramas, oblivious to yours. You watch yourself grow older in the comfort of her company, but you are always waiting for the other shoe to drop, too.
6. Make a Teddy!
Some circles do speculate that now the US is eyeing on certain other strategically important regions in South and Central Asia.
Bjorn the Fell-handed
Took my final bike to the Pantheon to look at the Eiffel Tower AND the Pantheon at the same time because this town is laid out so well that one can do such things. Parked the bike over in my hood and stopped by the butcher shop for yet another slow-mo smooch with Christophe.
I don't know if this would be considered Amish fiction (although I think so because there are Amish characters), but if it is, Missing is one of the better books I've read in the genre.
1/4 tablespoon salt
I think the views of Beaufort are simply awesome and I jut LOVE the love that they fet for each other. All the leukimia was just devastatig to me and that movie makes me cry every time I see it, I think I keep seying it because I’m waiting for a diferent ending, but unfortunatly that never happens. My favorite scenes from the movie are when he was making her wishes on her wish list come true, the cemetery scene, the one in the hospital, the one where he built her a new telescope and of course the wedding scene.
Last August the police had to close the largest gypsy camp in Britain at Dale Farm and the biased television news reports once again left gypsy men out of their news reports and documentaries.
Devi and Arianna could not know about this hardcore crush of hers; in retrospect, they could possibly throw her in a pit of fire and leave her to rot in hell for her half-baked intentions. In Leigh’s defense, he was really hot. And she wanted every piece of him. Hating the fact, Leigh could not stop reiterating that this was really bad.
I’ve had so much fun doing book challenges this year that I’ve decided to make my own! Unlike most challenges, which run for a calendar year, I’m going to do mine for just the summer. I wanted to start with something short to see how much interest it got, and we'll go from there! Plus, I know a lot of my readers are students or teachers, so summer is the optimal time for you to get lots of reading done. :)
I Was Made For Loving You
And to be honest, it hasn't gotten any easier since returning from Paris Trip #2. It's just become more clear that something has to change. Unfortunately, more clarity about knowing that something has to change doesn't exactly mean a more clear idea of WHAT TO DO comes along with it.
The cover of the artbook was posted above, which is a great Supergirl drawing by Shigeto Koyama. Next up is the contents page drawn by SGT, with a nice brooding Batman at the side.
The Daily Telegraph columnist was subsequently arrested on suspicion of committing public order offences by breaching section 18 of the Public Order Act, which refers to the stirring up of racial hatred.
I made this one below for someone I "met" on Flickr--the whole thing happened on Flickr! (Customer: "Hey can you make me one of those in colors X, Y and Z?" Me: "Sure.") Flickr is a very powerful marketing tool. If you have the time to post your work there, I would highly recommend it! The center beads are by BeingBeads, and the little ones are from TheSpacerQueen.
My body cramped up in pain
11.J.P. Nestor + Norman Edmonds - Black-Eyed Susie
I looked at Pujols' first 23 games every season of his career. Of course, it doesn't mean all that much. Six-sevenths of the season remains. But even if you just look at the first 23 games, Albert Pujols was a machine. He struggled a bit in the early going last year and also in 2007. But neither was anything like this year's start. And the other years are, well, Pujols-like.
The Gujerati man told him never to venture out far into the grasslands.
so good.
Tragically, the technology was not so perfect. The use of pure oxygen in the Apollo 1 Command Module proved to be a fatal flaw.
Since living near Austin we've been to San Antonio many times and also to the Alamo and Riverwalk many times but this was the first time I actually brought my camera to take some pictures. Our hotel was super close to the Alamo too so all the stars aligned to be able to take pictures on this trip. (Which was probably our last trip to San Antonio before we move!)
Have a great weekend everyone! I'm off to the mountains tonight for a much-needed mini vacation! I'll be back in a few days. If I survive our white water rafting trip.Wish me luck!
I managed to do a little bit more stitching this week on my Autumn MS Lovers Blog kitty and now there is some lovely orange and browny coloured leaves to see. Unfortunately an hour a day is not getting me very far with him, but every stitch is another stitch towards the end!
McBride was convicted of drunk driving in April this year after being arrested in December 2006. He was dismissed in September 2008.
I dislike: the queues in the understaffed supermarkets in my local area.
Former head of the Federal Reserve under Jimmy Carter when US economy nearly failed. Obama-appointed head of the Economic Recovery Advisory Board which engineered the Obama economic disaster to US economy. Member of anti-business "Progressive P olicy" organization.
sparklers
The story is an archetypal one of good overcoming evil and a young woman’s journey of self discovery.
The last 36 hours have been tough, grueling, as well as full of revelations, as they were back in 2006, when the government armed personnel attempted to take possession of customary and traditional lands along the last 70 miles of the Texas-Mexico border through the use of armed force and intimidation of the elders.
"After a serious on-camera accident and a controversial Easter episode, the Cap'n was pulled from the airwaves and eventually faded away into community cable obscurity. Now, fifteen years later, Ralph has decided to revisit the Cap'n in celebration of the 20th birthday of the creation of the character. With the help of his best friend Robert, he'll attempt to get back on the air one last time and give the Cap'n the send off he deserves. In the process, we revisit all of the ups and downs in Ralph's life and learn that those who are truly passionate about their art always manage to find an outlet and surround themselves with like minded, creative people."
“Look around Heather. You will never see this view again. Look at the cruise ship and NZ Navy ship. Enjoy the view” my head was saying, “There’s Russell over there’ ‘That’s Paihia that way’; ‘I can see the Treaty Grounds.’
Close your eyes
Congratulations Gina!!!....please can you email me (Joanne) by clicking HERE and I'll pass your email onto Annette at The StampFairy to contact you on how to claim your prize of...
So just click enter and roll the dice again.
The racing world is definitely in for a surprise tomorrow when they are taken by Liam and Aubrey...the dynamic duo!
Entry to the museum is just $2 but the feathers are worth much more.
Unfortunately there was some more snowfall in the week between, otherwise I believe we would have been almost bare now.
Arthur Kraft gave everything — maybe too much — to his art. Yet he wouldn’t have had it any other way.
Or a nun
I laughed. "Actually, it would not be a good decision to buy everything with our money." I saw a teaching moment on the horizon and reached for it. "We should talk to God and ask Him what He wants us to do with the money He gives us. Then, we can spend the money on only the best things."
In mid-1942, Freed had designer-director John Murray Anderson, musical director Johnny Green, costumer Irene Sharaff and swimming starlet Esther Williams all under contract to develop a vehicle for Williams, but a workable script had never materialized and the project remained on a back burner. So Freed went to Cummings and proposed a swap: the whole Esther Williams package for the rights to Girl Crazy as a vehicle for Mickey and Judy. Cummings liked the idea, so did Louis B. Mayer, and the thing was done. (Cummings later produced Bathing Beauty, Esther Williams's first starring picture.) Girl Crazy went into production in January 1943 with Busby Berkeley (who had directed the three previous Mickey-and-Judy musicals) directing.
he never tells me what covert action
The first was a "Buffalo Chicken Pasta" recipe I found on the WW message boards. It consisted of chicken breast and whole wheat pasta, in a sauce made of vinegar, light whipped butter, celery seed, Franks Hot Sauce, and Laughing Cow Cheese (it called for Herb and Garlic, but I only had the Sun dried Tomato so I used that... I threw in some garlic powder for a little garlic flavor). Being a Buffalo girl, I enjoyed the flavor of the Frank's Hot Sauce a LOT! It had that chicken wing-ish flavor without all the deep frying and butter. Not entirely the same, of course, but enjoyable nonetheless. It was a bit too spicy for the hub though. I forgot to take a picture before we ate it all up, so it will have to suffice that I say "yum!".
We say actual but victual.
I'm rippin' up a Rag Doll
All of this could be changing; at least the development rumors seem to be pointing in that direction. And a half-year's worth of data is just that: a half-year's worth of data. But it is interesting.
Are you guys excited about the release of my 2nd Edition of 12 Days of Christmas Handmade Crafts yet? We are now on Day 8 so that means there are 4 more projects to go before the release date.
On a day-to-day level no one knows who may turn up on their doorstep or accost them in the market place, a police officer ordering them to become an informer, a Maoist recruiter, or a Special Police Officer who may kill them to make up their quota of dead Maoists. Yet this scene has been set by those apparently benign men in suits who run the corporations.
Today I have a little bit of candy for my followers.
By the early 80′s, with the advent of the younger, hipper, American Hair Bands, the group began to lose popularity. Album sales and concert ticket sales started to drop and the band that had once packed the largest arenas and stadiums in the world, now found themselves playing smaller venues and clubs.
Only begin to guess.
Phase 2) Bomb country to rubble
Since solids can be unforgiving in showing mistakes in quilting I chose to have all my sashing pieces be seamless. The best way for me to do this was to purchase a piece based on the finished length of the quilt. So for my FIL's quilt I purchased 64" of Kona Ash, and for the Star Wars I purchased 75" of Kona Navy. By doing this I was able to cut my sashing pieces 4.5" by length of fabric and have no seams.
3) Announce a twitter hashtag to be used in tandem with the live streaming
I can make a mean cinnamon roll. And oh, sweet baked goods, how I love them.
Plus, if Lamar doesn’t get picked up for the NBA, the focus of the next season can be about them starting a family and undergoing infertility treatments.”
Christian: Christ- the name of Christ. -ian: forms a noun or adjective; descriptor. I call myself a Christian. I am supposed to be like Christ!
In today's modern and informed life, the strain of upcountry designing is not modified to furniture’s and accessories. Just mixture your house with furnishings would create the apartment materialize bulky and frowzy. The modern home decorations are distinct by the use of unequalled art and architectural items to promote furnish the furniture and constitute them with a chic and tidy wait. The home decoration stores are swollen with some incomparable decorating accessories. The deceive lies in using these items in a portion way to employ that overgenerous seem to your home. You can use these items in your own way to ornament your sanctuary with your own incomparable ideas.
I don’t remember what the next category was, but we lost. We had to go to a tie-breaker. The category was Supermodels who have appeared on the cover of Sports Illustrated’s Swimsuit issue. I was like, “What”! Clueless. I never paid attention to that before, and I sure hadn’t studied it.
You're out of line, out of line tonight
Did you ever get the feel that the Universe was reading your mind?
Fade skinny: Patient’s with this complex and debilitating condition need individualised nursing care tailored to their needs to give optimal symptom control and improve quality of life.
As I was drooling all over my sweater while I looked out their living room window at the lake, she shared with us how they have a "Dock Crawl" where they do open houses at different times of the year and everyone has so much fun. (Be still my heart! It's Stars Hollow on the lake!)Summer time finds the lake filled with paddle boats and ducks out in the yard at the water's edge.
5. Unholy Massacre
Now, jump over to a post that Lisa Morrison recently made at Hop Press. Ms. Morrison – in very few words – sums up the emerging “Black IPA” or “Cascadia” style and she makes an excellent argument for enshrining this as a distinct style. I don’t cotton to the label “Black IPA” since the name IPA already comes with a shipload of baggage (not the least of which is the dubious history behind the origin of the style). Is the Cascadia style ready to be set apart as a separate style for beer judging – I don’t think so, yet – but if it’s dark but not a stout, and it’s hoppy but not an IPA, then what the hell is it?
Eventually it was time for bed and to wait for Santa. The feast did leave me with terrible wind though, I’d like to say it was very Christmassy and sounded like Jingle Bells when it came out, but it didn’t. It sounded evil, and that's because it was. But as I was sharing a bed with Kates AND Peggy (who always sleeps under the blanket with us), I got my revenge on the sock eating little shit by farting on her head all night.
And other matters deemed of EXTREME importance to some (Ms B) such as the ground floor neighbour's bicycle being stored in the hallway and blocking access to the cellar. Oh yes.
The actual moon of Callisto is airless and the most cratered place in the solar system with one huge crater that is completely iced over.
Which Alabama player is most likely to have a breakout performance against the Nittany Lions?
I tend to be a person who feels that true faith is trusting God's timing even when it doesn't line up with the desires of my heart. And I think that is often the case. As I played with my "Jesus in the Box" so many different "what if's" came to me...and I'm thankful that God met me and put my mind at ease with the different options available on my own calendar. He found me where I was and with grace and mercy comforted me. But he also convicted me and challenged me. And what I feel from him this morning is that he doesn't want me to "cop out" with empty platitudes about his "sovereign timing".
so that means GIRLS NIGHT!!
I’ve got a long road ahead of me chickens.
2 sticks butter, room temperature
“Let him be crucified!” they all said.
Today’s song is a good one, albeit tongue in cheek. Wilco, The Thanks I Get is a love letter to marriage, in an ironic, realistic way. Enjoy the tune as I enjoyed my day. Our door is open when ever you want a burger or steak.
by Annie Wei-Yu Kan
Whether Youppi’s curse is fact or fiction, this story seems to interest people even today. The myth of the curse has remained with Youppi and continues to make people question as to whether the curse was really unleashed and if Youppi spreads his ‘ magic ‘ at every home game. What is known is that when you mix propaganda, facts, and hype you get a story that can be exciting. It all really comes down to one question. Do you believe in the curse of Youppi ?
It was to be a school friends birthday. Always a problem at this age. Are they still children, young adults or teenagers (as they should be)? What to get for a present?
Following the suicide of his cousin in 1992, Jack Heath had a vision: to connect with young people through the media they use, providing comprehensive resources and support to improve their mental health and well-being. His vision spawned the Inspire Foundation, which in 1998 launched the Reach Out website (www.au.reachout.com) in response to Australia’s then escalating rates of youth suicide. This award winning online service has been credited with contributing to Australia’s 56 percent reduction in youth suicide rates since the website’s inception.
And who knows the way
Eviscerating me to the core
8 ounces cream cheese, room temperature
This is one of those books where there are problems and frustrations you note as you read it, but then when you close the book after the last page, sigh happily, and say ‘that was a good story.’ Carson wrote a very satisfying type of traditional fantasy that I, an inveterate fantasy reader, couldn’t help but gobble up in one sitting. And yet there are many of the flaws of a traditional high fantasy book as well.
Morning juice was beet, celeriac root and carrot juice. Beets must have some magically fantastical properties to be in all of my juices but really it smells like my grandmothers basement. Some of the juices don't taste that bad but just having to pick up a beet makes me have a physical reaction.
Unlike The Two Doctors, however, nobody at all seems to be in on the joke. This is in an odd sense the bleakest dystopia Doctor Who has ever produced. In a season known for its black comedy here we finally have a dark joke played so straight that it doesn’t get itself. A piece of cruel absurdism that finally, mockingly asks, “so, then, this is what you want science fiction to be?”
I answered, “Political science.” With a smile.
As most of you know I'm sure, in my past life...(as in pre UK!) I was a scuba diver. Ok, I still am, just never ge to do it. The bad points of Scuba diving, is you don't know what you are going to see, how the visibility will be or any of the dangers out there. The same with snorkelling. With this reef, you have all the different 'safe' fish, and can snorkel in total safety knowing no harm can come to you. What a perfect enviroment to introduce snorkelling to children! (Not that I thought about it when I started snorkelling at the same age as Dill!) There were even sharks in the reef....well, it looks like they are, but they are actually in another part, but you can't tell till you touch the glass!
As you’ll see, it’s considered funny by the House generally (even she laughs to go along with it, though obviously Harriet Harpieperson wouldn’t have).
Remember the green light that just made him giggle and grin? Well that same pretty light is now the focus of much attention by the tiny man. It's no longer just for looking, laughing, and smiling at - It's for touching, grabbing, and trying to get! Thank goodness our camera lens is very durable and cleans up so nicely.
10So I say, Give ear to me, and I will put forward my knowledge.
9. Dancing in the Street
Hania also told me that the message given in this conversation was one he had communicated to her a number of times, and that I was conveying exactly what she’d heard before, but had been unwilling to take in. Perhaps Jesus felt that if he also spoke through another person, reinforcing the message, he would get these ideas through to her more effectively. And that did seem to be the case. The message was inspiring, soothing, and empowering, and it had a positive effect on both Hania and me.
Especially when this was your life:
In any event, the party made one of the best and brightest memories in my writing career so far. Getting to meet Mary Higgins Clark and my fellow nominees didn’t hurt. Getting to go to dinner with my fabulous agent David Hale Smith and editor extraordinaire Matt Martz didn’t hurt either. They have my heartfelt thanks for creating an evening that a very new writer will treasure forever. My next stop is the Malice Domestic mystery writers conference held in Bethesda. I’m looking forward to another few days of intrigue and suspense. Wonder if there will be wine and hors d’oeuvres…
Thursdays - Thankful Thursdays
16) SHOCK TREATMENT – The Invaders
But then I was distracted by some breaking news.
Friday, October 22nd @ 4 p.m.
And what a picture that Protestantism presents to us today. What is it now, the protestants create a new splinter group every what, 8 or 9 days, something like that. Even before Luther was dead and buried, the “protestants” were “protesting” against one another. And have been ever since.
In the last four games of the season, John Wall had at least 12 assists in each game. Wall is the only player not named Rajon Rondo or Steve Nash to have a streak that long this year.
Mix in 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract.
I don’t think we really believe there is no God. I think there is a yearning, a longing, yes even, a God-sized hole in all of us. We need the comfort of His perfect Love. We want to be wrapped us in the blanket of His protection. We want the warm, comfort-food of His Word.
I travelled up by train on Friday evening. There were only four carriages and it was standing room only all the way; it was also very, very warm. Problems on the west coast line meant that the train was even more busy than normal. The conductor kept apologising for the cramped conditions, her tone increasingly desperate as more squeezed in at every stop. Eventually I made it to Preston and checked in to my hotel. A meal, couple of glasses of wine, and a decent night’s sleep sorted me out.
It is raining, cold and just icky here so its starting off great here.
Teenage girls aged 12-17 are encouraged to apply. The application deadline is June 18, 2011. The application is available here: http://blackgirlsrockinc.com/live/sites/default/files/Summer%20Camp%20Application.pdf
child; excellent report cards or the beast will come. Daren’t take school friends
And now if you will excuse me, I am going to go get drunk.
Here's my sweet Amy in the finished product:
One interesting point that did come out from the conference was that part of the problem is that e-books are complex or the e-book market is not matured yet because they are available so many different formats and getting something as simple to work well in any platform can be a frustrating experience. All (publishers, aggregators, librarians) realized and agreed that it is a constant changing technological landscape and we, as information professionals need to be tuned , keep well informed about this medium and keep supporting the evolving needs of our users. Students have varied expectations for accessing resources and information and we must accommodate these technologies in order to support their learning.
All of Hicks’ character voices are perfect too – I have only one tiny quibble with her narration, and that’s her out-of-place nano-second pauses during narration. It’s not enough to be a big deal, just a little jarring. The story is kickass comedy with suspense as only LH does it, and the narration – long a Hard To Find audio, now easily available at Audible – does it Perfect Justice. Woot!
Next stepped forward a lanky somewhat sad looking man with his hair tied in a knot behind his head. He introduced himself as Garrison Graybolt. Next came Konar Wuldcarva who shook Hermel’s hand somewhat awkwardly. A thin man with a narrow face and light brown hair introduced himself as Selig Courtsman. He had frosty blue eyes and wore a wry smile. There was another man with an austere expression, close cropped hair, and wore a tunic on which was emblazoned the symbol of the Elkron of the Sun, Eldrik. He gave a courteous bow of the head, and indicated he was interested in listening to the proposed adventure. This man was named Star of Justice, but he did not introduce himself. He simply stood and listened intently. Lastly, a redish metallic tinged grasshopper landed on Rothomon’s desk. Hermel looked over and thought to swat the insect before it leapt away. However, before he did so, Rothmon stayed his hand with a quick intercession of his hand on Hermel’s arm.
Since Satan is referred to as a star which fell or was cast down to earth, and Revelation 12:4 says a third of the stars were cast out with him, then the conclusion is that the stars in Revelation 12 refer to fallen angels, fully one third of the heavenly host. If the one-third number is in fact accurate, what assurance that is! Two thirds of the angels are still on God’s side, and for followers of Christ, they are on our side as well.
Al Raas, who was traveling on a Canadian passport, was hauled into prison by Bahraini police just as he was about to board his flight at Bahrain International Airport. For one month, his family did not know of his whereabouts during which time he was severely tortured. He says he was deprived of sleep, subjected to mock executions, electrocuted and whipped all over his body with rubber hoses.
A: No. Stirred can be read and enjoyed without any knowledge of our previous titles.
In March of 1981, I was in New England on tour with the World of Fantasy Players' stage production of "The Magical Land of Oz". I'd just begun managing the show and one of my goals was to make the tour as comfortable as it could be for the players, yet cost effective for the show owner who was paying the expenses.
The seeds of the earth bed deep in the soil as the thunder of a thousand footsteps traverse their beds, sleeping patiently their silence forever gives the forest the sounds of life.
Secondary costs can also be reduced too, using a system to manage both temporary agency labour spend and the physical recruiting and payment of temps will instantly make the process quicker, reduce admin and almost eliminate paperwork.
So it's that time of the year, you know?
1 egg, slightly beaten
And at this stage in my career, I should know this by now. Duh!
God's love endureth forever ―
I took a look through Niina’s favorite books before I started to write this, because I like to get a feeling for the blogs I guest post on and match their theme. We’ve read and enjoyed several of the same books, which is pretty typical because it’s the reason I’m here. Then, I started to wonder what it was about these particular books that attracted us both, because vampires and eighteenth century Scottish lads really don’t have much in common, after all. Do Wrath, the leader of the Black Dagger Brotherhood, and Jaime, the Scottish Laird, have anything in common?
Around this time I started to think about spinning. I had read a few different blogs, watched videos online and read about it in books. I like the idea of being able to turn fluffy fiber into yarn. I ended up making a drop spindle and ordering some fiber. It was interesting at best. I struggled with the drafting process, and usually ended up with a giant mess of lumpy uneven fiber. I also came to realize my cats have an affinity for wool, the first time I had it sitting out, one of my cats came over and laid down beside me on the opposite side of the fiber. Calm as could be, in my tense and frustrated state I didn’t notice as he started to climb the over the back of the couch. All of a sudden I see a flash of white and my fiber supply is being whisked away by a feline, who acted so proud, he pranced away and carried it to his resting spot by my side of the bed.
(High five!)
Miscellaneous: Tim Holtz distress ink stamp pads Frayed Burlap, Crushed Olive and Dusty Concord; Pearls from my stash
Love, Mel. xx
In a move that can only be described as a clear response to these simmering stories that seem not to go away, Tokyo Electric Power Company has constructed what essentially amounts to a "mythbuster" page. You can click here to see it.
Mixed Media.. Friends with Flair!!
At the mountaintop, we find traces of glory
God and Jesus are, in other words, inseparable, in the sense that it is in Jesus’ role and status that the very nature and character of God is revealed in a new and climatic way.
The rub-rub-rub of two thighs together,
1. We reviewed the steps in solving word problems and the students wrote them down.
"Yeah, I'll see 'em next month when we come to class." I tell her
My kids were excited about snow, but not nearly as excited as they are to be counting down the days until we can go stay with their grandparents on the beach in San Diego!!
Q: It's every beginning author's dream to be noticed by a big name. You were singled out by Stephen King. Tell us how that happened so we can fantasize about it more accurately!
1. Love God with all my heart, soul, mind and strength
Councilman Lew Fidler told the Brooklyn Eagle that P.S. 114 “had been a terrific school in the past, until it was shot in both feet by a DOE principal. This school should succeed. I know this city’s agenda is charter schools — but they sent one principal in to wreck it, one to chronicle it and one to close it.”
Needless to say...we are really looking forward to Spring, RSV season being over, and being able to have our entire family in church - where we feel that we belong!
Your two other points may be dealt with more briefly. For the first: Not all cigars have holes in their heads; until they do, no wise man should go through life (unless he has the elegantly sharp teeth and a miraculous bite) chomping the ends off expensive cigars. For the second: My only answer is that you have never received a package from me. What I tie up stays tied forever, unless you have a knife. You will sooner find a piece of postal clerk caught under my string than you will find the string missing form my package.
Book Ayd to speak about Creativity and Inspiration for Innovation at your event. A great way to open your conference!
In the “new normal” that has emerged since the Great Recession, tenants have more control than ever when choosing a building. If I were a building owner or manager, that would be enough to have me start listening – and communicating.
On 19 June 1994, I remember the day exactly, I went out with an American friend of mine to do some shopping, the same friend who sent me off on a cookery course. We both lived very near Paris and both of us were coming to the end of our three years' stay in France.
I still idolized difficult modernist poets such as Ezra Pound and Wallace Stevens, and I listened with solemn but uncomprehending seriousness to the music of Schoenberg. Later I would learn to pick and choose my idiosyncratic way through the ranks of canonical writers, composers, artists, and filmmakers, but in my twenties I still had an unquestioning admiration for the Great—who were Great precisely because they were Great. Only later would I begin to see the selling of high art as just one more form of commercialism.
I want to keep it simple. To be entered in the raffle, simply add yourself as a follower to my blog and add my candy to your sidebar with a link back to my blog to help spread the word. Final step is to leave me a little comment on my
Overall, Dark Seeker was original and refreshing and I'm pretty freaking eager to read Dark Beauty and whatever else Taryn Browning has to offer!
Here's the progress I've made with Mary Konior's "Asters" edging. At one point I got so frustrated with the modifications I made to turn the corner, plus I found that I had miscounted a couple of rings, that I discarded what I had done and started over. I'm pretty happy with what I've got now.
counting it an honor if they were made a spectacle to the world, to angels and men;
I will, of course, have my camera with me, and try to remember to take lots of pictures.
As a person with a disability and the parent of a child with special needs, I was able to connect with parents in a way the average ‘social worker’ or teacher couldn’t. Parents appreciated having another parent to talk to and to help them navigate the special education system.
Q:�What can a man do while his
In theory, the motivation for the upsurge in Maoism in the second term of the UPA is said to be the hand over of vast tracts of tribal land to industrial and mining groups. In theory, the Maoists are said to be battling on behalf of the voiceless tribals who have suffered due to decades of neglect.
It was for a commercial. Set in the 1700s. The pig was playing a character. She was female, but the character was male, which is why she was in a jacket instead of a ball gown.
See you 'round the jobsite!
“What’s your alternative, Claypool?” Dr. Emerson shot back. “That we should all die? We’re still 48 days from Earth. This ain’t the commander’s fault. He’s just dealing with it.”
Hand & Body Butter Cream from Sexy Girl
4. Bad to Worst
PS: You may want to bookmark this blog, or add yourself as a follower - there is some more candy on the way this weekend, and you won't want to miss it!!
During that time I was still a newcomer to the needle and Marge was one of a group of new users I had gotten to know from the needle exchange. But Marge wasn't like the rest. He was well-spoken, cultured and had a kind of nurtured intelligence (which means he had been taught how to eat properly). For those superficial reasons he didn't scare me half so much as the people who lingered around him. God, these were some serious C.H.U.D'S*, only they lived uptop with us and were slightly more deformed. Some would sit down in the street behind Marge and I screwing blunt needles into leaking abscesses. Others would lower their trousers in a doorway and quickly ram a needle into their femoral artery. These users scared the shit outta me and I didn't like being anywhere near them. There was something so dirty and hazardous about the needle in those early days – even my own used works would trigger panic attacks. Marge however didn't scare me; he just alarmed me. Especially his behaviour around syringes. He seemed to be obsessed by them. He had this thing where he'd act like Mummy-nurse and remove and cap needles from nodding junkies bodies. He'd also accept needles full of pre-cooked dope in the street and bang them up without a thought (skin pop them right in through his jumper). It was scary business, and was the first thing which made me question why anyone would be so carefree around other's spikes' and blood. Some nights as we sat out in the dark I would watch Marge and wonder where he'd be now if things had have gone right? Probably an alcoholic... he had that kind of a face, and his nose was a wine taster's wet dream.
Hugs ♥T
I wanted to be able to just use the photos that I had, as is, so I cut all of my chipboard & PP to match the size photos I already had printed.
The last track to get the double-feature treatment is "Spiritual Growth", also from the first Tropics Mind. The Gathering The Light remix turns the electro-minimalism of the original into a chrome-polished night drive down a slick highway at night, open fires reflecting on the asphalt, while Jedediah Logsdon's takes the electro-minimalism of the source material and turns it into a plasticine byte of mnml tech-house.
Unless someone threated to tase me, I wouldnt laugh. Sheldon Cooper in red silver panties over leotard would have colored me "impressed", instead Iron man did color me "green" like the hulk guy and this dialogue of his, should say why
blah blah blah
than it took wing, fluttered away,
Barbecues – Hot sunny days, good friends, good food, what could be better? But as with so many good things in life, the naysayers will tell you that barbecues pose a number of health risks.
Now think.
Entries should be bottled in 2x500ml brown bottles, with gold crown caps, and posted to:
Second, Dawkins assumes that the simplicity of the whole is a function of the simplicity of the parts. This is an obvious mistake. A complex mosaic of a Roman face, for example, is made up of a great number of individually simple, monochromatic parts. In the same way, an ensemble of simple universes will still be complex if those universes vary in the values of their fundamental constants and quantities, rather than all sharing the same values.
Glastonbury, England. Over 40 local ales and ciders are on offer at the weekend Glastonbury Beer Festival, held on the grounds of the Tor Rugby Club. Entertainment is provided by a Guns N’ Roses tribute band, and the three-piece band Drewbag, which mixes acoustic style with British hip-hop and up-tempo grooves. (June 2 – 3)
I find these endlessly occurring divisions to be nothing short of futile when the main commonality that we all share is that we love, accept and cherish our children, teenagers and adults with or without Autism.
- THIS SUNDAY is my 7.3 mile Bloomsday Run. My good Buddie "The Dolphin goddess" hurt her knee, so rather than the luxury motel, mall shopping and fun trip, it has changed to my riding down with a friend from work mega early in the AM. Should be an adventure as i've never done anything with her before :-)
Sadie was not born in a barn, but she did live in one for part of her life.
Happy Field Tripping!
Mix 1 C. milk with 3 T flour in a small container with lid.
I love the beading on this piece. The bodices on the dresses as is the bottom border are hand beaded!
With hints of vanilla, melted chocolate chips, and a slight crunch, they make a great tea-time snack or desert.
I love introducing people to a hobby that I love. I love sharing the time, the experience, the challenges and victories with my friends.
25. Trim Up The Tree - How The Grinch Stole Christmas
Too bad Levi never cut a deal with “Levi” jeans. However he might still stand a chance. This photo, courtesy of “U S Weekly” shows him standing in a rather sensual pose with his hand in his pocket obviously keeping those Spermapalozza’s at bay. Either that, or he’s into pocket pool.
The dragon’s eyes glowed, for a flickering moment, with white light.
This article originally appeared in the March 2011 issue of The Four Marks as part of a series called "The Restoration." "The Restoration" is a monthly column dedicated to restoring Christian ideals in our modern culture. For more information on The Four Marks, please click here.
Love keeps them in the sky
But is it really feminism?
Saving has become something of a myth
Oh, and those people who say bubble hemlines are no good for pear shaped (i.e. biggest/widest at your bum and hips) girls don't know what they're talking about. Experiment and find what works for you.
This book was definitely a girly book. There are parts that I think guys would enjoy, like fighting with trolls and driving like maniacs, but I wouldn’t tell a guy he’d love it based only on that. I thought the book was very entertaining and a great debut story. I can’t wait to read the next one.
The image is the cute "Dangling Sea Edwin", stamped in front of the "Sea Background". And also the papers are from Magnolia´s Bon Voyage Collection. The saying is handwritten, the ancor is a punch by Martha Stewart.
so I was just an alien at the school.
But I have a plan. It's essentially the drug dealer strategy applied to publishing. I'll give them the first column free. When their readers scream for more, or my readers bombard them with glowing comments (which I would never encourage, but certainly wouldn't want to stand in the way of, if you get my drift) then I'll really stick it to 'em.
There are a handful of interviews with grown unschoolers to be found online, but in my mind, not enough. So I've decided to have a permanent (as in, the link to it will live on the sidebar) grown unschoolers questionnaire on my blog, that I'm going to invite any and all grown unschoolers to fill out! If I get filled out questionnaires regularly, they will be posted regularly on this blog. If I get them occasionally, they will be posted occasionally. Point being, there will (unless no one at all is interested) be a series of interviews with grown unschoolers coming up.
Hells Fire Brigade: (H) 4 (E) 3 (L) 5 (L) 5.
The success of the whole structure was extremely sensitive to the size of the axle. While a narrow one would reduce the amount of friction, it would also be too weak to support a load. Meanwhile, a thick axle would hugely increase the amount of friction. "They solved this problem by making the earliest wagons quite narrow, so they could have short axles, which made it possible to have an axle that wasn't very thick..."
Now don't let my hopeful words above in any way legitimize the United States' actions over the past ten years. We've been the opposite of rational and virtuous at nearly every turn, and the assassination of a terrorist mastermind doesn't exactly negate all of that. However, the fact that it happened under a new president with a new strategy, along with an amazing speech that emphasizes the fact that our country is not, and never was, at war with Islam, but that we can be (though the Tea Party, or many other intolerant people people would say otherwise) a nation that embraces diversity - diversity of religion, racial diversity, sexual diversity, gender diversity - and can be a place that the rest of the world will look at and wonder at how well our heterogeneous country, the most heterogeneous on the planet, work so well.
This year I embraced red and white as my colour themes, and so the search was on for some nice, inexpensive white glossy paper. Which is apparently impossible. I had my eye on easel paper that comes in rolls, but what Officeworks provided me was something much, much better.
After eating lunch in one of Hubby's most favoured 'resturants' a little while ago, I decided that I could make a home made version of my lunch choice (a pulled chicken 'sandwich' ... if it comes in a bun I consider it a burger, but maybe that's just me!) and it would probably taste far better than the dish that was presented to me at the restaurant. Turns out it was still a pretty tricky meal to try and perfect at home, although it was significantly better tasting and a fraction of the cost. There is some further experimentation required to perfect the recipe though this is my starting point.
Round 4- Brandon Mosley, offensive tackle, Auburn
Be sure to stop by. You wont want to miss it.
Over the Holy Week, my family set aside a day to celebrate Passover. We didn’t go through the entire Haggadah and have all the elements that are usually involved. That would be fantastic, but the encouragement is to use what you have and keep things simple for you and your children, especially if this is a new experience. We got special bread (Challah), grape juice, brisket, matzo ball soup, matzos, roasted potatoes, asparagus and more (hungry yet?). We reviewed the Exodus account and focused on the matzo (unleavened bread). We talked about how the stripes and piercings remind us of what Jesus did for us. We also talked about the grape juice as a reminder of the blood Jesus shed. In essence, we led our family through a “Lord’s Table” experience at our “Family Table.” We also had Mimi (my mom) join us for the festivities which made it a multi-generational experience. It was a great time of showing Christ as the center of our family life. My brother even sent me a text after hearing about it and asked about he and his wife joining us for next year!
The Review: I was been told to read this book years ago by someone with a reading taste I trust, but for some strange reason I kept on putting it off. Then a couple months ago I was reminded to read this book by the author’s brilliant speech “The Danger of a Single Story” (watch it, especially if you have even the tiniest interest in storytelling) and I was like, how did I not get around to reading her works yet? So I finally checked the book out of the library earlier this month and damn, what a haunting read. Beautiful, intense, and I was a fool for not having read this sooner.
the road, and nothing more;
Money was spent but no money was taken in. In fact, the only thing taken in by Dracula Vs. Frankenstein was the audience. Adamson never made anything again with the name recognition he has here - certainly not with Five Bloody Graves and Psycho a Go-Go.
Penny has been physically removed. Responsibility for team management is now shared between Macy and Kurt.
Down South Blues by John Schooley & His One Man Band
‘Therefore, I think it’s time that we look at what I call a tycoon tax. If you’re earning millions per year, if you’re able to pay an army of lawyers and accountants to basically pick and choose what tax you are paying, if you are paying as low as 25, 20 per cent or even less in tax, there should be a minimum fair share that you should pay to society.’
On Friday it was one of those days where you struggle ( in other words, you struggle with the toddler) to get out of the house. Finally, hours later we were on our way to a friends house to do some serious thrift shopping. Before I got there, my work called me expressing their concern on why I haven't shown up for work the past two days, so, I had to turn around and go to work.
“Consider, for example, the infamous and amazingly still extant Hotel St. George. It hardly ever seemed to stop burning…”
I came across Harvey Prince, America’s online fragrance company serving your needs for perfumes for women & men, bar soap, bath & body products. They design and conceive the inspiration for each fragrance in-house. In addition to their own research and surveys, they regularly work with leading dermatologist, doctors and scientists on studies regarding certain smells and their effects on women/men. Their master perfumers handcraft each fragrance in their New Jersey facility.
So many people out there have a strong desire to live a more simple life.
Austin received an award for perfect attendance this year, something he's been striving for every year, but hasn't been able to achieve - mostly because he had business in China or became ill from something the carriers brought to him. This year, he finally made it. Not a minute missed. No absences, no checkouts, no nothing. And we couldn't be prouder of him for his responsibility, perseverence, and dedication. Yes, he's a little unusual, wanting to not miss a day, but that's just him. Austin also had a great year in the classroom, though he and I had our battles with Advanced Trigonometry! Austin reminds me alot of myself when I was in school, not wanting to miss anything and wanting to excel in everything. We're very proud of his achievements in the classroom this year. We're also proud of his achievements in his two favorite extracurricular activities - band and golf. His drumline didn't quit practicing with the end of marching season, working for two hours every Tuesday and Thursday right thru spring. If you want to experience an awesome drumline next season, come out to East and hear them perform. They're gonna rock; now, if only I can convince Mrs. Sam to let 'em do some Toby Mac! Austin also completed his 4th year on the golf team and played as the '1' most of the time. He's really improved his game to the point where shooting for par is starting to become a reasonably achievable goal. With a couple more years on the Golf team, he might even parlay this talent into a break for his mommy and daddy when it comes time to pay for college! Go East Golf!
Climb like champs and trash-talk each other most of the time (all in good fun).
His Ray Bans, and is now lost.
This is AHS's American Red Ale recipe with Vanguard hops instead of the original Cascade. On this last attempt, they've substituted Amarillo on the recipe, but I'm trying to recreate my earlier Red. This is one that is very popular with folks that aren't hop-heads.
Ten more days. Is that even possible? Time flies when you’re… waiting? The calamitous waves off in the now very short distance are still threatening to look at. I only issue quick glances, hoping that maybe they’ve disappeared; this was all just a bad dream. It never happens. It’s all just as real as it was 89 days ago, yet my perspective is graciously and generously enriched with trust and peace. A very powerful fear tries to gain access to me. Sometimes it almost does. I am quick to remind it that, “I trust in Jesus. Go away.” There is great power in saying that because the fear and anxiety always retreats. I might have to say it a few times, but fear has NO power over my God.
I have not done extensive price comparisons, but I do know the cost of dates from Nuts.com was lower than those at my supermarket. I try to buy all the items I’ll need for the foreseeable future in one order to minimize my shipping costs.
Hollywood presence: Levitz rose to fame playing the characters Tommy Flanagan the Pathological Liar and Mephistopheles on Saturday Night Live
I was in love instantly!
Neighbors described him as a doting father of four children who had been having relationship problems and, lately, acting strangely.
“The company is working diligently with the union and employee leadership to resolve this work stoppage,” he said in an e-mailed statement.
The Homeschool Buyers Co-op has a great deal available now through 31 May for folks purchasing Mark Kistler’s art lessons. Not only can you get the program at the 60% discounted price, but you will also earn 200 bonus smart points! Check it out and let me know what you think.
So anyhow, I really had planned to be home by about 11pm last night, but Patty kept telling me to have "just one more" in her adorable, Patty way, and so I kept having just one more until next thing I knew I was on my way home at almost 2am. Oops. One of the beers I tried "just one more time" was this new microbrew called "Fireman 4" and I have to say, that is one of the BEST tasting beers (blonde ale) I have EVER had. Holy moly what a great beer. It has layer upon layer of flavor and manages to be smooth and crisp and complex all at once. YUMMEEEE.......
But it gets yet more interesting, when one considers contemporary cinematic choreography. Tatlin’s closest friend from university went on to marry a woman whose sister taught dance, first in Moscow, then in Paris, then in New York in exile. The school she started in New York to support herself during the war included, at one point, a young Beatriz X – who would later befriend world famous film editor Walter Murch.
So we decided to place our newly-acquired lightning rod in the front yard ivy bed as a piece of historical art. We considered it sculpture. A neighbor wandered down the sidewalk one day while we were doing yard work. “What’s that?” he asked us. “It’s an antique lightning rod.” He squinted and scratched his head. “Is it attached to something?” We looked at our neighbor with mischievous smiles as Cheryl began the yarn, “It sure is.” Then, we let our imaginations run wild, fabricating a new story: A tornado had blown an old mid-western farmhouse all the way to the west coast, where it finally landed like a meteor making a huge divit in our front lawn. Over the next 100 years, the ground had settled and the ivy began to grow. The only visible reminder is the old lightning rod that still sticks up out of the ivy—the roof only a few feet underground. Should we ever decide to excavate, we would find the entire house three stories down, furnishings and all!
I will say also that not every child around here thinks only of getting. The local papers have been a bit happier in the past month, with titles like "The true spirit of Christmas". This is about a young boy from up here who has cancer and considers himself one of the lucky ones as he will be home for Christmas. For this reason he started an appeal for presents to be given to the children who will not be at home this Christmas. And of course this has had tremendous support and despite not-ideal weather conditions, everything arrived!
Thursday morning I was told to pack for an overnight. "Take something nice to wear". I packed, said good bye to Esther and at 1:00 PM we got into the car, the three of us. I sat in back and fell asleep. When I woke up I saw this cute face.
Next week is Thanksgiving. I fucking love Thanksgiving. It's during my favorite season, it focuses on my favorite kinds of food, and there are usually copious napping opportunities. Something I do NOT love? Traveling during the holidays and/or traveling on IH-35, both of which I get to do for this coming Thanksgiving holiday. We're actually going to be at my mom's on Thanksgiving Day, which is a short, non-busy drive and will involve her cornbread dressing, which is truly one of my favorite foodstuffs in the world. So that's good. But the next day, you know Friday...Black Friday...the busiest travel day of the year? We're loading up the car with all three kids and heading to "The Christmas Capital of Texas," Grapevine. Sigh. This whole thing is the brainchild of BH's mother, Dixie. And I love Dixie. Really, I do. And I love my brother and sister-in-law and their kids, who are also going to this family gathering. But OMFG, I am not looking forward to the travel. And also? We're going to be staying here, which means that we'll be dealing with the other thing I despise: holiday crowds. I know that The Geej is going to love the shit out of it. And like I said, I really do love BH's family, so I'm just going to have to focus on that. Because if not? I may lose my shit. BH feels the same way about this whole endeavor, btw. Hopefully we'll be able to keep each other from committing sepuku.
That, however, doesn’t give the rest of us license to use those terms and, because I have so many gay friends, I find “fag” most inappropriate.
Two feet who remembered the cold creeks, sand grains rolling over the waves between their toes, the sun warming them on the stones and the lovely sound of cicadas calling for a nap.
with riddles of longing and love and sighs
In other words, I’ve quit my writers group because I’m not a writer. I’m a writer of no-fiction. Quitting was necessary to address the vain enjoyment I derived from telling people I was in a writer’s group, the orgasmic thrill of having something concrete to write on Facebook next to ‘Activities’ (‘Writing’), the _________ of __________ on _____________ (fill in the blanks for a tricolon). It’s a shame because I liked the group, the critique was useful and they could cook. Boy, could they cook. But when you’re thirty years old with a kid and a job and a wife and you spend two nights of a busy week reading and talking about other people’s stories and the other five telling people what you do on the other two nights and hoping beyond hope that it is enough to be involved in the activities surrounding writing to call yourself a ‘writer’, you know it’s time to stop pretending and grow up. I’m not a writer. There, I said it, and I’m free.
But if we look closer at the Beeston memorial we’ll notice something else. Both those local men enlisted on April 26th 1846, which surely suggests they were friends who entered the army together. They weren’t just ‘cannon fodder’; they were individuals, men with names and faces.
(D)
Metacritic: 48
Preheat oven to 350° F.
Despite what is now a laboriously slow operating speed, ENIAC was the fastest supercomputer of the time and condemned its contemporary mechanical relay computers, operating at Bell Laboratories and elsewhere, to the dustbin of history because they operated two orders of magnitude slower.
Repair Existing Pet Resort Signage, and new signs $ 1,400.00 (King Signs)
leading them astray?
The woman slammed out of the dwelling carrying a bundle of items in her arms. Reaching the edge of the stream, she dropped her load and scurried to braid and tie her wet hair.
The title of the book is Understanding Psychology by Robert S. Feldman. Just search it if you want to see why I am acting like this.
“Complex technology of any sort is an assault on human dignity. It would be little short of disastrous for us to discover a source of clean, cheap, abundant energy, because of what we might do with it.”
Too fast, sometimes
Please feel free to join with any one of them or get great ideas from them. Please let the wold know all that you are doing to help stop genocide. When you write it down and share it with others online by video or in person you inspire others to take similar actions.
Redemption is linked to Karma.
For some weird reason I naively envisaged having a bit more time to myself once she graduated from 'newborn' status....(yeah, I can hear your collective snicker :-)....turns out I was wrong.
After the first
"What is wrong with that?" - some may quite rightly ask, not realising we live in a country, part of a continent that, with the best will in the world, have never been able to sustain itself and its people without alms and food donations.
Nothing can beat, when you offer a bottle of whisky to PWD caretaker and he opens a VIP room.
So for that, I am glad I went.
Hubby and I started the cooperative campaign and are a couple hours in. Right now he's playing the single-player version and I'm trying my best to not pay attention so as to not spoil anything for when I play.
This is my typical process when creating illustrations for clients. I have used it for years and it works well for me. Some people draw with their Wacom and print it to color, though I like the hand-eye control of working with my traditional pen, not the digital pen (I use the Wacom tablet or mouse for touch-ups). I hope this give you some ideas about how to professionally approach your own artwork for those of you who are new illustrators.
You want to look for keyword phrases that you can get a high positioned PPC ad for a low cost – preferably under $.20 cents a click. If the product you are promoting is in a less competitive niche then you should find a lot of keyword phrases that you can use, but if your product is in a more competitive niche then it will be more difficult finding those great keyword phrases.
What does "wrong" parenting look like? Well, I have an opinion on that, believe it or not. I listed a few examples last year in this post, but I could probably sum it up by saying that things like physical abuse, guilting, coercion, lying, arbitrariness, and screaming/yelling/belittling would fall into the bucket of things that make my stomach turn. So imagine how pleased I was to see the following post on Facebook yesterday from an old friend who I actually think is a very good mom:
Another room offers a religious perspective on death. Christian and Catholic artwork provides a foundation on which to examine the common fate we all share in our relationship with death. Artistic images are used to relate the concept of death to the individual.
Her: I don't know I'll have to check my schedule and get back to you.
It is better late, proverbially speaking, than never. Nine months after she won the election to become prime minister, Yingluck Shinawatra last Sunday visited the deep South for the first time since she took office. Surrounding her at a Pattani barracks – for the well-dressed dignitaries wouldn’t be so foolhardy as to step out of the fenced quarters – were high-profile ministers and generals. The visit was on April 29, a day after the 8th anniversary of the harrowing siege of the Krue Se mosque, on April 28, 2004, in which soldiers killed 108 people and left dozens more widowed and orphaned in multiple places including Saba Yoi district in Songkhla and Krong Penang district in Pattani. At Krue Se alone, 32 people were killed.
The people who own the chocolate drippings have enclosed it in a glass box, and keep it air-conditioned, so that it will not melt. They have far more fortitude than I do, obviously. If I had that chocolate in front of me, I would have eaten it eventually, even if I truly believed that it was the Virgin Mary, which leads us to an interesting question: If you ate the Virgin Mary, would you go to hell? I can't find anything about it in the Bible, although it says that eating Jesus is okay. In fact, eating Jesus is actually a required thing, if you can believe that. Go figure. I think that if eating Jesus was so important, they should definitely make him out of chocolate, and then more people would want to eat him, as he would be tasty.
Left Hand Twin Sisters DIPA
ESPN - Flacco’s agent, Joe Linta, created a stir in February when he said Flacco should be considered a top-five quarterback based on wins and losses.
9 - Another male holidaymaker claimed his fear of heights had prevented him from enjoying his flight to Mauritius.
join the group to lead them on
93. Learning Tree, The: Gordon Parks
Solo or in a group?
Lord Slynn attacked the traditional family: “family need not mean either marriage or blood relationship."
it will be for me to sew but I can't claim it completely
However, it could be argued that many of the supposed benefits of a lower limit have already been achieved, with a change in public attitudes over the past twenty or so years leading to a growing reluctance to drive after drinking even within the legal limit. In the early years of the breathalyser law, this was widely regarded as normal and responsible behaviour, and many pubs prospered on this “car trade”. Indeed, the ultimate high water mark of beer sales in British pubs was not reached until twelve years later in 1979. However, from the mid-80s onwards, there was a distinct shift towards the view that drivers shouldn’t touch so much as a half of lager, which has become commonplace amongst new entrants to the driving population.
Well, at least he didn’t jump down my throat, right? He just kind of sat there looking stunned for what felt like forever—eyebrows pulled together, arms crossed tightly across his chest, mouth slightly agape. When he finally spoke it wasn’t what I expected, “I told you this would happen if you kept getting your information off the internet.”
The coronor, Brian Sherrard, praised the Grew and McCaughey families for the dignity they had shown throughout the inquest.
I am sure that Wyatt will send Brian a lot of signs on Father's Day, which means more than anything materialist ever can. But I wanted to ensure that Brian had something to open, something that would be a reminder of Wyatt for years to come.
The proposal includes two welcome changes: widening of the sidewalk curving into the park at the south side of Atlantic by shifting the bike lanes into the street and changing the B63 bus route to eliminate the U-turn. Unfortunately, the bike lanes will be protected with jersey barriers, a distinctly second-rate configuration which will probably remain in place for years, slowly deteriorating.
The duo, whose faces have been covered all through the trial and would never be recognized by any of us if we were to see them without cover, is appealing their case in August.
And I promise him one hell of a storyline.
I am both–I am my parents’ child and I am biologically their (my birthparents’) child. Why can’t they recognize that I am both?
When does it occur?
Oh, yes and we loved the movie and the books. All the classic themes are there in a refreshing original, creative concept. Great job, Kudos Ms. Collins. You’ve been added to my fan girl list of mentors.
“No. What happened?”
So your grandmother was your age in the 1960s. If you were born after 1980, that seems forever ago, so let me just mention this: it wasn't exactly a decade of staid sameness.
Eva and Addie started out the same way as everyone else--two souls woven together in one body, taking turns controlling their movements as they learned how to walk, how to sing, how to dance. But as they grew, so did the worried whispers. Why aren't they settling? Why isn't one of them fading? The doctors ran tests, the neighbors shied away, and their parents begged for more time. Finally Addie was pronounced healthy and Eva was declared gone. Except, she wasn't...
Hope you all had a lovely safe and happy Easter too.
jeans
When it happens, it’s not because I think I am superior – quite the opposite. It’s because I feel insecure and need reassurance. I over-compensate. Curiously enough, as I’ve become more successful as a beer writer, my ‘arrogance’ has declined as my inner confidence has grown.
I think depression can be its own tool, but it is very very difficult to capture, and when it is captured, it will eat away at itself, depression will gnaw its own foot off to get free. Never doubt this.
1 pigmentation
Fay Weldon, author of over 30 novels, wrote: “I read Glass Geishas in one sitting, with a break for sleep. “This does not usually happen. It’s a terrific read.”
-Miz is side stepped to the outside and the the cobra is teased when Miz comes back in.
The little pictures are of Bananas with his head covered. One has a knife held up to him and the other is with timer and it reads “Time is ticking”.
Every 10 mins or so, Sylvester would nudge my arm, notifying me that another plane was coming in. I could see headlights through the spotty night clouds. Planes from Jamaica and Great Brittian would fly low into my line of sight, and land somewhere behind us.
There are a few nearby. One only delivers to people IN Stouffville…but that’s ok. I don’t want cantaloupe. LOL. I’m ok with a simpler harvest.
"My name is Judah Roderick Owens. I learned that horses make great cupcakes."
Here are a few photos from the tribute. María looks exactly like Jorge did when he was her age! And Hugo, Hector and Mateo could be triplets!
And when he had finished his song the old stone laughed for a good long time, for the tale was good and the ending of the song pleased him.
I love my boys dearly…
One could have felt content with the mere fact that it was possible to get that many people out into the streets to demonstrate against fascism if it was not for the fact that some of the most well intended speakers and protesters seemed to support the very evil that they thought to deplore.
Fermented with McCoy's house ale yeast; cellared 2 months
-O...you want it to be cold..and rainy...windy and wet....
* Note that Carol Faye used Martha White self rising flour, and so do I. Self rising flour is hard to find in Michigan, but Meijer carries it. There has been much written about the demise of White Lily flour since they closed the mill in Knoxville. So go with the Martha White!
Now, the crucial point about sleep is that quality is more important than quantity. The best bit of the nightly snooze is the first part, when the brain is switched off and the spirit resides in a peaceful void on the dark side of the Moon. Things go downhill when the brain wakes up and finds that nothing is happening. In its boredom, it manufactures the mental poo we call “dreams”.
I’m curious … what was the last really great choice you made?
Aarhus, Denmark
Skyrim’s an experience on every gaming level, an experience not to be missed. The reports you’ve either read in game mags or on the net are true and I’m sorry to say I’m going to repeat them now as I come to a close—it will eat your life, you will be late, you will neglect your normal everyday duties—hell, this review was written two weeks later than I had planned, due to a little more “research”. But for such an experience of this quality Skyrim’s more than worth it. Just remember this should you decide to enter this alternate reality: there’s no such thing as too many lock picks…
Matthew 3:15
On my way to the noodle shop, I stopped at my bank to get some spending money from the ATM. The little ad that flashed on the ATM screen when I inserted my card showed a 30-ish woman with her head tilted back in some mild form of ecstasy. The tag line read: "Access your account. Access your dreams." That slogan, provided to me free of charge through Citibank but for which some numbnuts on Madison Ave. got paid a shitload of money to think up, almost made me want to close my account and start putting my money under my mattress.
Then is one I bought a few weeks ago, apparently it's called Scattered Flowers and is another CK design. Not sure what I'll use it for yet (as with most fabrics I buy it's only a pretty small piece because I can't afford more!) but I thought it was so pretty and it combines my three favourite colours - blue, pink and red.
Lately I've been looking at criteria for a good D&D setting because I knew I had a few ideas kicking around, and I wanted a structure for looking at the opportunities objectively. I'm intrigued by the idea of a D&D setting in the early modern period, but when bouncing the settings up against the things that make a regular D&D setting great, some issues emerge. Let me know if you agree.
The beginning of the article states that when you get on ‘online shooter games like Call of Duty or Battlefield:2142′ you hardly hear a female voice. I would have to agree with that. You usually hear a teenage male playing the game while breathing heavily into his mic without even realizing it. That first paragraph of the article is something I completely agree with, however, the rest of the article just stung me in the wrong places.
it's a fun, i-didn't-realize-it-would-become-a-tradition-but-has-become-a-tradition
There were no secrets you could keep,
Jonah attempts a second shot but the gun is empty and Jonah realizes that the gun is some sort of fake. He runs out of the saloon and into a futuristic corridor and he finds several armed guards rushing towards him. Jonah attempts to flee but he he is stunned by the ray-rifles the guards wield.
It’s an unfortunate fact of computer science: when a computer program runs, it will do what it’s programmed to do, even if it’s programmed to be harmful. When you choose to run a program, you are making a decision to turn over control of your computer to it. Once a program is running, it can do anything, up to the limits of what you yourself can do on the computer. It could monitor your keystrokes and send them to a website. It could open every document on the computer, and change the word “will” to “won’t” in all of them. It could send rude emails to all your friends. It could install a virus. It could create a “back door” that lets someone remotely control your computer. It could dial up an ISP in Katmandu. Or it could just reformat your hard drive.
Time to drink. This pilsner is very refreshing and good. It has great carbonation which balances out the european hops. Pilsner Hops are known to somewhat attack the palate, and this beer is no different. The taste lingers in your mouth quite nicely. This beer is really tasty. It’s served from a 650ml bomber at 5.3% ABV. As you drink it, this beer leaves a lovely delicate lacing in the glass.
ME: Please ask him to call me because I told him not to do anything until I had a price.
it has to do with the cold, dreary, winter days ahead.
So good times, straight ahead. : )
I tell you all this today because Peach is marking 20 months in treatment tomorrow. With, hopefully, about eight more to go. This kid of mine: Amazing. She just keeps plugging along - stiff joints, steroid weepies, and all - smiling every step of the way. Since we last spoke, she brought the house down at GGMS's graduation ceremony (don't get me started), she raised over $3000 for childhood cancer research, and she designed a freaking Hermione Granger video game. She made it through two weeks at sleep-away camp, and last week, she stared down Middle School - and won. Whatever the challenge, she takes it on and does incredible things. And sweet, sweet Olive is her biggest supporter. Truly, I'm about to burst over the both of them.
Internet Security vulnerability announcements get pretty boring sometimes. I thought it would be worthwhile to, err, fire one up.
That doesn't change.
Standing on a train platform a few days ago I plowed through the latest issue of the Atlantic, pausing for a long while on an hysterical, girl power, four page riff on women’s hormones. The following paragraph may have changed my life:
Two summers later, I went into work one gorgeous blue and golden morning. I was working in the O.R. and as I looked at my slate list, one name seemed vaguely familiar; a woman to be prepped for a Caesarian section. As I pulled the curtains aside, her eyes met mine. The smile froze on my face. The last time I had seen those eyes was that sorrowing day in the E.R. wracked in anguish over the body of her little boy. She recognized me immediately. Instinctively, she held out her arms to me, and we hugged.
Chipboard Letter, K & Co: Colored with V06, RV29. This started out a light blue, so all I needed to do was add purple to get it to match the flower, then I had to tone the purple more pink with an RV29. I wiped off dense color with a wadded tissue soaked in blender.
blundering into mysterium
It is fully dark, at the end of an idyllic Sunday spent with my grandmother (Nana) on the boat.
With St. Patrick’s Day around the corner, we want to see projects that use ANY shades of green or use anything that is recycled, but please make sure to mention what your recycled item is or your entry will be deleted.
another tragic thrill
I’m glad it’s been cold lately. Enchiladas are pretty comforting to me. Well, maybe not comforting? Reassuring? They make me feel like… like if I were to have a bad day and then the bartender buys me a drink and gives me one of those “life is bullshit, it’ll get better” winks. You know what I’m talking about. The non-creepy kind of free-drink-wink that bartenders give you.
I was there, snapping away at the flowers, and was asked to pull double duty. It was a fancy little party, so my jeans were minorly mortifying. Afterwards I immediately met a friend for dinner and ordered the best steak of my life. Or at least, the most well earned.
I'd like to think we've been busy. I'd like to say that perhaps I've been so busy that there just weren't photo opportunities. Bwahahahaha.
Take Paul Revere. Booorrrrriiinnnnnggg. He rode a horse and bellowed about the British coming, which–granted–was important information. But what if he also could have let the general non-Loyalist public know about some outstanding solutions to their dilemma of what to serve for dinner?
My first love was a book.
He looked around. A wide path cut through the corn, and the tall stalks afforded some protection from the incessant wind.
7) Garlic, 1 bulb (cook with skin intact)
In 1939, Levant married for the second time, to singer and actress June Gale (née Gilmartin), part of the singing foursome The Gale Sisters (besides June, there were Jane, Joan, and Jean). They were married for almost 33 years, until his death, and had three children, Marcia, Lorna, and Amanda.
My words have all run dry, but there’s a prayer my heart still sings,
To President-elect Francois Hollande, I wish you success. After all, Stéphane and I hope to live (and pay taxes) in Paris for four more years. It's our home, even if we are outsiders.
Last place? Well, I did have some bad luck with my equipment. I managed to break the berger button less than a week before the championship. And once you change that (or any other part), nothing is really the same. Only two weeks ago I reached a score which would take me one or two places higher.
Mom and I are going to go to the hospital to see Amber, Che', and little Tayen then off to the grocery store to get ingredients for Adam's last requested meal: Copycat Pachanga's or Garcia's Pollo Fundido. The rest of the day will be spent visiting with Adam and enjoying that time together. He'll be set apart at 9:00 then off to bed for an early departure to the MTC. I'll be staying home with Brycen while my parents and Amy take him down there. It's going to be an emotional day!
Yes, I was wrong to check her boobs. I mean, I myself had none even when I reached 21, so I asked her if I could see what I had been missing. It was my first time for Pete’s sake (not you). Should he be so mean to me? Was it necessary for him to drag me into the woods and shoot me?
Amber - Thank you Ivan! We’re inspired by designers like yourself who have broken the silence and created a dialogue within our community. Victoria’s design scene is mostly made up of solo designers or small companies with a hand full of people at the most. Why should we all be working in a vacuum when coming together not only strengthens our profession, but creates a pool of resources and support for everyone.
Monday: work, and because of farm things this morning, I didn't get to work until 10:30a.m. good thing my boss is good with a flexible schedule, but then I didn't leave work until 7:30 pm.
Half Full Bright Ale
OK so now onto the cards there are 8 Nationals represented in the set 4 of them pitchers including the official Opening Day Starter Stephen Strasburg who went 7 innings on Opening Day in the 2-1 Curly W Win vs The Cubs. He allowed 5 hits, 1 run and 1 walk plus 5 strike outs 82 pitches and a 1.29 ERA, however it was Tyler Clippard relieving in the 8th and throwing 14 pitches who was credited with the win and Brad Lidge with the save. Clippard and Lidge are not represented here, but Home Opening Starter Gio Gonzalez (I'm not impressed with him so far) is along with Drew Storen and Jordan Zimmermann.
Those are just a few of the tasty treats! There are even little stories in the book. One is entitled: Fifi the Huntin' Poodle.
Unfortunately, things get in the way. One person may be overly attached to one particular solution: so we attempt to seek what is Good: “God’s will”, or the highest Good accessible from where we are now. We need to seek that good without attachment. We need to love and consider each person in the room. We need to allow each person to say what they feel moved to say, trusting that the process will lead us to the right decision through each of our presence, despite each of our failings; and we need to be content with unknowing, and defer a decision to another day if necessary.
Directed by: Phil Lord and Chris Miller
Morello: The chill of cold, hard justice.
I don't always agree with the Pub Curmudgeon. He does though live up to his strapline "A jaundiced view of life". Thus it was that I read and disagreed with his views expressed here about a pub re-opening in Stockport. Mudgie reckons local CAMRA members are showing how out of touch with real pub life by suggesting that the pub "leave one or two areas free of noise so that the serious real ale drinker can enjoy the beer without unnecessary distraction?". Now this is a little inelegantly put, but having read about Mudgie's example elsewhere, all that was being suggested (by one person, not a cabal of CAMRA nutters) was that they don't have so called background music at top volume everywhere in the pub. Not that unreasonable surely?
See, a whole list of hazy craziness. We guess you might like to see some matching hazy crazy pictures? Consider that added to the list.
It's just so hard to watch. It's really starting to hit me that she's getting the age where I can no longer control all of her environment. I can't control 100% of the time how's she's treated or how she feels. I'm protective; I know. I just wish she could always be happy, safe, and treated fairly. First nursery, preschool isn't too far off...she's only 18 months! They don't tell you when you bring home your bundle of pink from the hospital that you have less than two years to shelter her, then it's hello world.
Then, some years later, I was at another conference in California. At the conclusion of the meeting a man came up to me and said, “You were at a conference a few years ago in such-and-such a place.”
Does she live nearby?
James Bond is probably one of the most commonly known names across the world due to the series of movies that have been made with the character. But I think it will be very less number of people who would know the name of Ian Fleming who is the author behind the James Bond books and that included me as well till some time ago. I did not think earlier that these movies are based on very successful series of books written by this author. When I got to know about it, I obviously wanted to read the book and that it how I came across “Goldfinger”
Expected CTC:
Planter flexion place your toes by bending your ankle causing the toes to move towards the floor if you are sitting or lying. This is most helpful to nurses assessing a resident/patient for a positive Homan sign. This may show a possible blot clot in the lower extremity especially the calf. Sometimes the calf may be painful during this exercise. Report this immediately to the nurse.
Our "promo" on cable ended and the bill went up to $68.11/month! For an almost basic package. Ugh! I called Comcast asking for a better rate and was told "we can give you a lower price."
Cardstock and printed papers.
My brother called me and asked if I was angry with him for not being here more. No, I said. How can I be angry? Yours is a different path. I may be designated caregiver, but he is the designated closer–the one who closes the deal when mom needs to do something that she is resisting and she won’t listen to me. That doesn’t happen as much. Her will is strong, but I have also learned to be more tactful. “Mom, what are you going to do when you can no longer get up?” “I’m going to call Karen.” “Good plan, mom.” I’ve learned to let go more and let it happen, rather than trying to second-guess her or the future. I would have saved myself a lot of trouble if I had learned that earlier.
Back to work… Back to sitting at my desk staring at the dual monitor set-up.
Stephanopoulos: unemployment is down!
I leave tomorrow a.m. for my 20th high school reunion. I have quite possibly done the most brilliant job of wardrobe planning and packing known to humankind.
where they laugh... chat... inspire...
All’s good!!!
The venue
placed in the mid zone of the wall.
whether the fact that Sweden has not implemented, in the prescribed period, Directive 2006/24, had an impact on the previous question.
I really got the taste of it, when listening to all that
Everyone that has beat this evil has, whether they understand this or not, achieved the Great Work — a full detachment. They learnt how to live and let thoughts of addiction and cravings come (because they do come, many years after, but come only for a second. strong and never-ending second). Those great Masters have achieved to acknowledge the thought rising, interacting with them for a second, and then letting it go.
